   #alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate
   alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate

   Trusted Shops - The safe way to web shopping Trusted Shops - The safe
   way to web shopping

     * Login
     * Features
     * Support
     * References
     * More

   Shop finder Login Register now

Customer reviews knowledge base

Self-service support

   The knowledge base articles and tutorials will help you to get up and
   running with Trusted Shops customer reviews. If you don’t find what you
   are looking for, simply give us a ring or drop us an email.

Getting Started

   Find everything you need to start getting better reviews.

Integrate Trustbadge^®

   Integrate your Trustbadge^® within minutes. Show your seller rating and
   stars to your customers and get a continuous stream of incoming
   reviews.

Collect Reviews

   Fully automated or web-based without integration, straight away or
   later - you can collect reviews in various ways.

Show Reviews

   Trustbadge^® Technology, Public Review Profile, Review Sticker and how
   to embed everything properly.

Manage Reviews

   Always be up-to-date, reply to comments and show you that you care for
   your customers.

Google Seller Rating

   How to create more visibility on Google, how to show your stars
   automatically.

Software integration

   Using Magento, Shopify, ePages or similar? Find simple how-to's and
   plug-ins.

Product reviews

   More visitors, higher conversion rates, fewer returns.

Traffic Package

   More visitors and customer loyalty. You are just a few clicks away from
   starting your own campaigns.

FAQ

   Everything you want to know from our support team. And your gateway to
   our great APIs.

   Trusted Shops Logo
   © 1999-2019 TRUSTED SHOPS GmbH. [flag_en-EU.png]

     * [flag_fr-BE.png] Belgique / België
     * [flag_en-DK.png] Danmark
     * [flag_de-DE.png] Deutschland
     * [flag_es-ES.png] España
     * [flag_fr-FR.png] France
     * [flag_it-IT.png] Italia
     * [flag_nl-NL.png] Nederland
     * [flag_de-AT.png] Österreich
     * [flag_pl-PL.png] Polska
     * [flag_de-CH.png] Schweiz
     * [flag_en-SE.png] Sverige
     * [flag_en-GB.png] United Kingdom
     * [flag_en-EU.png] Rest of Europe
     *

   All rights reserved. Contact, FAQ, Data privacy and Imprint

   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-TPWN9Q
   #alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate
   alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate

   Trusted Shops - The safe way to web shopping Trusted Shops - The safe
   way to web shopping

     * Login
     * Features
     * Support
     * References
     * More

   Shop finder Login

Data protection

   privacy

   Thank you for visiting our website http://www.trustedshops.eu.
   Protection of your privacy is very important to us.
   Below you will find extensive information about how we handle your
   data.

Privacy Statement

   Thank you for your interest in our website. The protection of your
   privacy is very important to us. Below we inform you in detail about
   the handling of your data.

1. Access data and hosting

   You can visit our website without providing any personal information.
   With every visit of the website, the web server automatically saves a
   so-called server log file which, for example, contains the name of the
   requested file, your IP address, date and time of the call, the amount
   of data transmitted and the requesting provider (access data) and
   documents the call.

   These access data are evaluated exclusively for the purpose of ensuring
   trouble-free operation of the site and improving our services. This
   serves according to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f GDPR the protection
   of our legitimate interests in the proper presentation of our offer
   that are overriding in the process of balancing of interests. All
   access data will be deleted no later than seven days after the end of
   your visit to the site.

   Third-party hosting services
   Within the framework of processing on our behalf, third party providers
   provide us with hosting and presentation services for our websites. We
   use the following service providers for hosting the respective website:
   URL
   Hosting Provider
   etrusted.com/en Raidboxes GmbH, Friedrich-Ebert-Straße 7, 41853
   Münster, DE

   trustedshops.co.uk
   ANEXIA Internetdienstleistungs GmbH, Feldkirchener Straße 140, 9020
   Klagenfurt am Wörtersee, Österreich
   business.trustedshops.co.uk HubSpot, Inc., 25 First Street, 2nd Floor,
   Cambridge, MA 02141, USA
   shop.trustedshops.com/en Timme Hosting GmbH & Co. KG, Ovelgönner Weg
   43, 21335 Lüneburg, DE

   If a service provider is based in the USA, it is certified under the
   EU-US Privacy Shield. A current certificate can be viewed here. As a
   result of this agreement between the US and the European Commission,
   the latter has established an adequate level of data protection for
   companies certified under the Privacy Shield. Further, we have agreed
   the application of EU standard data protection clauses with other
   service providers based in a country outside the EU or the EEA in order
   to provide suitable guarantees pursuant to art. 46 para. 2 lit. c GDPR.

   All data collected in the context of the use of these web pages or in
   forms provided for the purposes as described below are processed on the
   servers of the respective service provider. Processing on other servers
   only takes place as described within this privacy statement.

2. Data collection and use for the use of Trusted Shops products

   We collect personal data if you voluntarily provide it when contacting
   us (e.g. via contact form or e-mail). Mandatory fields are marked as
   such, since in these cases we require the data for processing your
   contact or opening of the customer account in accordance with art. 6
   para. 1 sentence 1 lit. b GDPR and you cannot send the contact without
   this information. Which data is collected can be seen from the
   respective input forms. We use the data provided by you to process your
   enquiries.

   We have engaged service providers for the technical processing of your
   inquiries on our behalf. These service providers are based in the USA
   and are certified under the EU-US Privacy Shield. As a result of this
   agreement between the US and the European Commission, the latter has
   established an adequate level of data protection for companies
   certified under the Privacy Shield.

   After complete processing of the inquiry, your data will be restricted
   for further processing and deleted after expiry of the storage periods
   under tax and commercial law, unless you have expressly consented to
   further use of your data or we reserve the right to use data beyond
   this, which is permitted by law and about which we inform you in this
   declaration.

Live Chat Tool Userlike

   If you use the live chat tool to make contact, the data you voluntarily
   enter there (name, e-mail address, message) will be stored on our
   behalf at our service provider Userlike on servers within Germany. They
   will be processed there for the purpose of answering the inquiry by us
   and subsequently deleted in accordance with art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1
   lit. b GDPR.

Registration for Trusted Shops buyer protection

   When subscribing for Trusted Shops buyer protection, we need your
   e-mail address, the total purchase price, the selected payment method,
   purchase order number, your customer number (if you have one) and the
   name of the online shop from which you ordered the product.

   Your data will be used within the scope of contract processing in
   accordance with art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. b GDPR for the purpose
   of providing the Trusted Shops buyer protection to you.

   Only in the event of a claim under the buyer protection we require
   additional information and personal data from you to review and process
   your claim for reimbursement. When registering a refund claim, your
   name, address, telephone number and bank account will be charged for
   the refund.

   With the buyer protection you also get access to the Trusted Shops
   customer login (My Trusted Shops). In the Trusted Shops customer login
   you can see your active and concluded buyer protection contracts,
   submit refund applications and submit or change ratings for your
   orders. Your e-mail address serves as identification and user name for
   access to My Trusted Shops. You have the possibility to personalize
   your membership account by voluntarily entering further personal data
   such as your name, place of residence and/or a profile picture in the
   Trusted Shops customer login or when submitting a rating.

   Your submitted ratings can then be displayed with these additional
   details, although some details to protect your privacy are always only
   displayed in abridged form. Similarly, a summary of all assessments
   submitted can then be publicly retrieved. Your email address will not
   be publicly displayed. You can change or remove your personal data at
   any time in My Trusted Shops. You can also deactivate the public
   display of your profile there.

   After complete processing of the contract or deactivation of your
   customer account, your data will be restricted for further processing
   and deleted after expiry of the storage periods under tax and
   commercial law, unless you have expressly consented to further use of
   your data or we reserve the right to use data beyond this, which is
   permitted by law and about which we inform you in this declaration. You
   can deactivate your customer account at any time and either by sending
   a message to the contact option described below or using the function
   provided for this purpose in the customer account.

Subscribing to rating reminder

   If, during or after placing your order, you grant an express consent
   according to art. 6 par. 1 sentence 1 lit. a GDPR to receiving email
   reminders, your email address will be transferred to Trusted Shops for
   the purpose of sending you email reminders about rating your purchase
   order using the Trusted Shops customer rating service. If you subscribe
   to the automated rating reminder service, you will be automatically
   receiving email reminders about rating a transaction after every
   purchase from the Trusted Shops members. On your every visit, you will
   be recognised based on anonymised data. You may withdraw your consent
   to receiving email reminders at any time, with effect on your future
   orders.

   If you submit an evaluation via the Trusted Shops evaluation system, we
   require your e-mail address within the framework of our user contract
   in accordance with art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. b GDPR in order to
   ensure the validity and trustworthiness of the evaluation. The e-mail
   address will be stored for this purpose together with the order number
   and the evaluation submitted. When you submit a product review, the URL
   of the product and the product image, the product name, the product
   SKU, GTIN and MPN, and the manufacturer are also saved.

   In order to make the rating system secure, to prevent incorrect or
   falsified ratings and to ensure proper operation of the rating system,
   we also collect your IP address when you submit a rating. This serves
   to safeguard our legitimate interests in the prevention of misuse and
   the protection of our systems that are overriding in the process of
   balancing of interests in accordance with art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1
   lit. f GDPR. The IP address is stored for a maximum of 7 days for the
   evaluation and then deleted.

Social login via Facebook or Google

   You can link your Trusted Shops buyers account to your Facebook or
   Google account.

   Facebook, Inc. and Google LLC are based in the USA. They are certified
   under the EU-US Privacy Shield. A current certificate can be
   viewed here. As a result of this agreement between the US and the
   European Commission, the latter has established an adequate level of
   data protection for companies certified under the Privacy Shield.

   In case of a link between the accounts, you will only need to
   authenticate to Facebook or Google using your login information to be
   logged into your Trusted Shops customer account for buyers. For this
   purpose, you will be asked to consent to the transmission of the
   following data to Trusted Shops the first time you create a link:

   Facebook: E-mail address, name, profile photo, age range (e.g. 35-39),
   language, country and other data that you have set to public on your
   Facebook profile.

   Google: E-mail address, name, profile photo and other data that you
   have posted on your Google profile as publicly available.

   The data Trusted Shops receives from Facebook or Google will be used to
   help you design your shopper profile on the basis of your consent
   pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. a GDPR. Facebook receives
   the e-mail address from Trusted Shops the first time it is linked in
   order to identify you as a user, and afterwards only the ID that has
   been set as an authentication feature for you between the two systems.
   Facebook or Google does not receive any further data. You can unlink
   the accounts at any time and revoke the transfer of data with future
   effect by changing your settings on Facebook (here) or Google (here).

Registration for Trusted Shops membership for online merchants

   An application for membership for online merchants is only offered to
   persons acting in the exercise of their commercial or self-employed
   professional activity. Personal data is collected for the purpose of
   contract processing in accordance with art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. b
   GDPR if you voluntarily provide it to us when contacting us or
   registering for our services.

   After complete processing of the contract, your data will be restricted
   for further processing and deleted after expiry of the storage periods
   under tax and commercial law, unless you have expressly consented to
   further use of your data or we reserve the right to use data beyond
   this, which is permitted by law and about which we inform you in this
   declaration.

Application for a job at Trusted Shops

   If you apply for a position at Trusted Shops via this website, personal
   data will be collected in our application portal for the purpose of
   handling the evaluation process in accordance with art. 6 para. 1
   sentence 1 lit. b GDPR.

   This portal is operated by a service provider who processes the data
   collected on its servers on our behalf .

   The data you provide in our application portal will be used exclusively
   for the purpose of filling the advertised position and checking and
   processing your application submitted in this context. After completion
   of the application process, this data will be blocked for further use
   and deleted upon expiry of any storage obligations, unless you
   expressly consent to any other processing.

3. Data transfer

   If you have ordered goods which we will send to you by post, we will
   pass on the data required for the fulfilment of the contract in
   accordance with art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. b GDPR to the shipping
   company commissioned with the delivery if this is necessary for the
   delivery of ordered goods. Depending on which payment service provider
   you select in the order process, we pass on the payment data collected
   for the processing of payments to the credit institution commissioned
   with the payment and, if applicable, to payment service providers
   commissioned by us or to the selected payment service. In some cases,
   the selected payment service providers also collect this data
   themselves if you create an account there. In this case, you must log
   in to the payment service provider with your access data during the
   ordering process. The data protection declaration of the respective
   payment service provider applies in this respect.

   We use a payment service provider based in a country outside the
   European Union. The transmission of personal data to this company only
   takes place within the scope of the necessity to fulfil the contract.

Credit check when registering for Trusted Shops membership for online
merchants

   Only if you act in the exercise of your commercial or self-employed
   professional activity, we transmit your address data to credit agencies
   when concluding a membership contract for online merchants for the
   purpose of assessing the liability risk and for credit assessment if
   necessary. This serves to settle the contractual relationship pursuant
   to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. b GDPR.

   We transfer the personal data required for a credit assessment to the
   following company(s):

   Verband der Vereine Creditreform e.V.
   Hellersbergstr. 12
   D-41460 Neuss, Germany

   Appropriate measures to protect your rights, freedoms and legitimate
   interests will be taken into account. You have the opportunity to make
   your views known and to challenge the decision by contacting the
   contact person described below.

4. E-mail newsletter and postal advertising

E-mail advertising with registration for the newsletter

   If you register for one of our newsletters or provide your data in
   order to download a document free of charge from our website or our
   Facebook or LinkedIn presence, we use the data required for this or
   separately provided by you in order to regularly send you our e-mail
   newsletter on the basis of your consent in accordance with art. 6 para.
   1 sentence 1 lit. a GDPR.

   The newsletter is sent on our behalf by service providers to whom we
   pass on your e-mail address for this purpose.

   If the newsletter is sent via a service provider based in the USA, it
   is certified under the EU-US Privacy Shield. As a result of this
   agreement between the US and the European Commission, the latter has
   established an adequate level of data protection for companies
   certified under the Privacy Shield.

   You can unsubscribe from the newsletter at any time and either by
   sending a message to the contact option described below or via a link
   provided for this purpose in the newsletter. After deregistration, we
   delete your e-mail address unless you have expressly consented to
   further use of your data or we reserve the right to use data beyond
   this, which is permitted by law and about which we inform you in this
   declaration.

E-mail advertising without registration for the newsletter and your right of
objection

   If we receive your e-mail address in connection with the sale of a
   product or service and you have not objected to this, we reserve the
   right to regularly send you offers for similar products, such as those
   already purchased, from our range by e-mail in accordance with Section
   7 (3) UWG. This serves to safeguard our legitimate interests in an
   advertising approach to our customers that are overriding in the
   process of balancing of interests in accordance with art. 6 para. 1
   sentence 1 lit. f GDPR.

   The newsletter is sent on our behalf by service providers to whom we
   pass on your e-mail address for this purpose.

   If the newsletter is sent via a service provider based in the USA, it
   is certified under the EU-US Privacy Shield. As a result of this
   agreement between the US and the European Commission, the latter has
   established an adequate level of data protection for companies
   certified under the Privacy Shield.

   You can object to this use of your e-mail address at any time by
   sending a message to the contact option described below or via a link
   provided for this purpose in the advertising e-mail.

Postal advertising and your right of objection

   Furthermore, we reserve the right to use your first and last name as
   well as your postal address for our own advertising purposes, e.g. to
   send interesting offers and information about our products by post.
   This serves to safeguard our legitimate interests in an advertising
   approach to our customers that are overriding in the process of
   balancing of interests in accordance with art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1
   lit. f GDPR.

   The advertising mailings are processed on our behalf by a service
   provider to whom we pass on your data.

   You can object to the storage and use of your data for these purposes
   at any time by sending a message to the contact option described below.

5. Integration of the Trusted Shops Trustbadge

   To display our ratings collected, the Trusted Shops Trustbadge is
   integrated on some of our websites.

   Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. f GDPR, this serves to
   safeguard our legitimate interests in the optimal marketing of our
   offer that are overriding in the process of balancing of interests. The
   Trustbadge and the services advertised with it are an offer of Trusted
   Shops GmbH, Subbelrather Str. 15C, 50823 Cologne.

   When the Trustbadge is called, the web server automatically saves a
   so-called server log file, which contains e.g. your IP address, date
   and time of the call, transferred data volume and the requesting
   provider (access data) and documents the call. This access data is not
   evaluated and is automatically overwritten at the latest seven days
   after the end of your page visit.

6. Cookies

   To improve the user experience on our website and enable you to use its
   certain features in order to show suitable products or conduct market
   research, some pages of this website use the so-called cookies. This
   serves the protection of our legitimate interests in the optimised
   presentation of our offer according to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f
   GDPR that are overriding in the process of balancing of interests. A
   cookie is a small text file which is stored automatically on your end
   device. Some of the cookies we use are deleted after you close the
   browser session, i.e. when you close the browser (that’s the so-called
   session cookies). Other cookies are stored in your end-user device and
   enable us to recognise your browser when you visit us again (persistent
   cookies). To check the cookie storage period, you can use the Overview
   function in the cookie settings of your web browser. You can configure
   your browser for it to inform you whenever a page uses cookies and
   decide on a case-by-case basis whether to accept or reject the cookies
   on a given website or generally. Every browser has a different policy
   for managing the cookie settings. The browser’s policy is described in
   the Help menu of every browser and explains how you can change your
   cookie settings. To find out how to change the settings in your
   browser, see the links below:

   Internet
   Explorer™: https://support.microsoft.com/en-gb/help/17442/windows-inter
   net-explorer-delete-manage-cookies
   Safari™: https://support.apple.com/kb/PH21411?locale=de_DE&viewlocale=e
   n_US
   Chrome™: https://support.google.com/chrome/answer/95647?hl=en&hlrm=en
   Firefox™: https://support.mozilla.org/en-US/kb/enable-and-disable-cooki
   es-website-preferences
   Opera™ : http://help.opera.com/Windows/10.20/en/cookies.html

   Please note that disabling cookies may limit your access to some
   features of our website.

a. Web analysis

Use of Google (Universal) Analytics for web analysis

   For website analysis, this website uses Google (Universal) Analytics, a
   web analysis service of Google LLC (www.google.de). Pursuant to art. 6
   para. 1 sentence 1 lit f GDPR, this serves to safeguard our legitimate
   interests in an optimised presentation of our offer that are overriding
   in the process of balancing of interests. Google (Universal) Analytics
   uses methods that enable an analysis of your use of the website, such
   as cookies. The automatically collected information about your use of
   this website is usually transferred to a Google server in the USA and
   stored there. By activating IP anonymisation on this website, the IP
   address is shortened prior to transmission within the Member States of
   the European Union or in other states party to the Agreement on the
   European Economic Area. Only in exceptional cases will the full IP
   address be transmitted to a Google server in the USA and shortened
   there. The anonymous IP address transmitted by your browser within the
   framework of Google Analytics is not merged with other Google data.
   After the end of the use of Google Analytics by us the data collected
   in this context will be deleted.

   Google LLC is headquartered in the USA and is certified under the EU-US
   Privacy Shield. A current certificate can be viewed here. As a result
   of this agreement between the US and the European Commission, the
   latter has established an adequate level of data protection for
   companies certified under the Privacy Shield.

   You can prevent Google from collecting the data generated by the cookie
   and relating to your use of the website (including your IP address) and
   from processing this data by Google by downloading and installing the
   browser plug-in available under the following
   link: http://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout?hl=en. As an alternative
   to the browser plugin, you can click this link to prevent Google
   Analytics from collecting data on this website in the future. An
   opt-out cookie is stored on your mobile device. If you delete your
   cookies, you must click the link again.

Use of Hubspot for web analysis

   For website analysis purposes, Hubspot, Inc. (www.hubspot.com)
   Automatically collects and stores data from which user profiles are
   created using pseudonyms. Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f
   GDPR, this serves to safeguard our legitimate interests in an optimised
   presentation of our offer that are overriding in the process of
   balancing of interests. Cookies may be used for this purpose. After the
   end of the use of Hubspot by us, the data collected in this context
   will be deleted.

   Hubspot, Inc. is headquartered in the USA and is certified under the
   EU-US Privacy Shield. A current certificate can be viewed here. As a
   result of this agreement between the US and the European Commission,
   the latter has established an adequate level of data protection for
   companies certified under the Privacy Shield.

   You can object to the collection and storage of data at any time with
   future effect by clicking this link. After your objection, an opt-out
   cookie is stored on your mobile device. If you delete your cookies, you
   must click the link again.

Use of Hotjar for web analysis

   For website analysis purposes, data is automatically collected and
   stored on this website using technologies of Hojar Limited
   (www.hotjar.com), from which user profiles are created using
   pseudonyms. Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f GDPR, this
   serves to safeguard our legitimate interests in an optimised
   presentation of our offer that are overriding in the process of
   balancing of interests. Cookies may be used for this purpose. The
   pseudonymised user profiles are not combined with personal data about
   the bearer of the pseudonym without express consent to be given
   separately. After the end of the use of Hotjar by us the data collected
   in this context will be deleted. You can object to the collection and
   storage of data at any time with future effect by clicking this link.

   After your objection, an opt-out cookie is stored on your mobile
   device. If you delete your cookies, you must click the link again.

Use of Optimizely for web analysis and A/B tests

   For website analysis and A/B tests, data is automatically collected and
   stored on this website with technologies of Optimizely GmbH
   (www.optimizely.com), from which user profiles are created using
   pseudonyms. Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f GDPR, this
   serves to safeguard our legitimate interests in an optimised
   presentation of our offer that are overriding in the process of
   balancing of interests. Cookies may be used for this purpose. The
   pseudonymised user profiles are not combined with personal data about
   the bearer of the pseudonym without express consent to be given
   separately. After the end of our use of Optimizely the data collected
   in this context will be deleted. You can object to the collection and
   storage of data at any time with future effect by clicking this link.

   After your objection, an opt-out cookie is stored on your mobile
   device. If you delete your cookies, you must click the link again.

Use of Tealium

   This website uses technologies from Tealium, Inc. (www.tealium.com)
   Automatically collected and stored data from which user profiles are
   created using pseudonyms. Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f
   GDPR, this serves to safeguard our legitimate interests in an optimised
   presentation of our offer that are overriding in the process of
   balancing of interests. Cookies may be used for this purpose. The data
   collected in this context will be deleted once we have ceased using
   Tealium for its intended purpose and at the end of its use.

   Tealium, Inc. is headquartered in the USA and is certified under the
   EU-US Privacy Shield. A current certificate can be viewed here. As a
   result of this agreement between the US and the European Commission,
   the latter has established an adequate level of data protection for
   companies certified under the Privacy Shield.

   You can object to the collection and storage of data at any time with
   future effect by clicking this link. After your objection, an opt-out
   cookie is stored on your mobile device. If you delete your cookies, you
   must click the link again.

b. Advertising via marketing networks

Google Tag Manager

   We use the Google Tag Manager to manage usage-based advertising
   services. The Tag Manager itself is a cookie-free domain and does not
   collect any personal data. Rather, the tool triggers other tags that
   may in turn collect data (see above). If you have disabled at the
   domain or cookie level, it will remain for all tracking tags
   implemented with Google Tag Manager.

Google Double Click

   This website uses the so-called DoubleClick cookie as part of the
   Google Analytics application, which enables your browser to be
   recognised when you visit other websites. Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1
   sentence 1 lit f GDPR, this serves to safeguard our legitimate
   interests in an optimal marketing of our website that are overriding in
   the process of balancing of interests. The information automatically
   generated by the cookie about your visit to this website is transferred
   to a Google server in the USA and stored there. The IP address will be
   reduced by activating IP anonymisation on this website prior to
   transmission within the Member States of the European Union or in other
   states party to the Agreement on the European Economic Area. Only in
   exceptional cases will the full IP address be transmitted to a Google
   server in the USA and shortened there. The anonymous IP address
   transmitted by your browser as part of Google Analytics will not be
   merged with other Google data. After the end of the use of the Google
   services by us the data collected in this context will be deleted.

   Google Double Click is a service of Google LLC. (www.google.de). Google
   LLC is headquartered in the USA and is certified under the EU-US
   Privacy Shield. A current certificate can be viewed here. As a result
   of this agreement between the US and the European Commission, the
   latter has established an adequate level of data protection for
   companies certified under the Privacy Shield.

   You can disable the DoubleClick cookie using this link. You can also
   contact the Digital Advertising Alliance to find out how to set cookies
   and to make the relevant settings. Finally, you can set your browser so
   that you are informed about the setting of cookies and decide
   individually whether to accept them or to exclude the acceptance of
   cookies for certain cases or in general. If cookies are not accepted,
   the functionality of our website may be limited.

Google AdSense

   Our site uses Google AdSense to market space for third-party ads and
   advertising networks. These ads are displayed in various places on this
   website. As part of the integration of Google AdSense, the so-called
   DoubleClick cookie is set by Google for all page visitors. This enables
   the display of interest-compatible advertising by automatically
   assigning a pseudonymous UserID, with the help of which the interests
   are determined on the basis of visits to this and other websites.
   Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f GDPR, this serves to
   safeguard our legitimate interests in an optimal marketing of our
   website that are overriding in the process of balancing of
   interests. After the end of the use of the Google services by us the
   data collected in this context will be deleted.

   Google AdSense is a service of Google LLC (www.google.de). Google LLC
   is headquartered in the USA and is certified under the EU-US Privacy
   Shield. A current certificate can be viewed here. As a result of this
   agreement between the US and the European Commission, the latter has
   established an adequate level of data protection for companies
   certified under the Privacy Shield.

   You can disable the cookie using this link. You can also contact
   the Digital Advertising Alliance to find out how to set cookies and to
   make the relevant settings.

Google AdWords Remarketing and Google Analytics Audiences

   We use Google Adwords Remarketing and Google Analytics Audiences to
   advertise this website in Google search results and on third-party
   websites. When you visit our website, Google sets the so-called
   remarketing cookie or additionally uses the Google Analytics cookie. In
   this case, both cookies automatically enable interest-based advertising
   by means of a pseudonymous CookieID and on the basis of the pages you
   have visited. After our use of Google AdWords Remarketing and Google
   Analytics has ceased and has ended, the data collected in this context
   will be deleted. Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f GDPR, the
   use of these tools serves to safeguard our legitimate interests in an
   optimal marketing of our website that are overriding in the process of
   balancing of interests. After the end of the use of the Google services
   by us the data collected in this context will be deleted.

   Any additional processing will only take place if you have agreed with
   Google that your web and app browsing history will be linked to your
   Google Account and information from your Google Account will be used to
   personalise ads you see on the web. If you are logged in to Google
   while visiting our website, Google will use your data together with
   Google Analytics data to create and define target group lists for
   cross-device remarketing. To this end, Google temporarily links your
   personal data with Google Analytics data to form target groups.

   Google AdWords Remarketing and Google Analytics are services of Google
   LLC (www.google.com). Google LLC is headquartered in the USA and is
   certified under the EU-US Privacy Shield. A current certificate can be
   viewed here. As a result of this agreement between the US and the
   European Commission, the latter has established an adequate level of
   data protection for companies certified under the Privacy Shield.

   You can disable the remarketing cookie via this link. You can also
   click this link to prevent future collection by Google Analytics on
   this website. An opt-out cookie is stored on your mobile device. If you
   delete your cookies, you must click the link again.

   You can also contact the Digital Advertising Alliance to find out how
   to set cookies and to make the relevant settings.

AdRoll Retargeting

   Through our advertising partner AdRoll Advertising Limited, Level 6, 1,
   Burlington Plaza, Burlington Road, Dublin 4, Ireland, we advertise this
   website in search results and on third-party websites. When you visit
   our website, a cookie from these providers or their partners is
   automatically set, which enables interest-based advertising by means of
   a pseudonymous cookie ID and on the basis of the pages you visit.
   Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f GDPR, this serves to
   safeguard our legitimate interests in an optimal marketing of our
   website that are overriding in the process of balancing of
   interests. After the end of our use of AdRoll Retargeting, the data
   collected in this context will be deleted.

   You can disable the retargeting cookie by clicking on one of the
   following links: https://app.adroll.com/optout/safari.

   Alternatively, you can disable the use of cookies by third parties by
   visiting the opt-out page of the Digital Advertising Alliance.

LinkedIn Insight & Conversion Tag

   Through our advertising partner LinkedIn Corporation, we advertise this
   website on the LinkedIn platform (www.linkedin.com). When you visit our
   website, a cookie from this provider is automatically set, which
   enables interest-based advertising by means of a pseudonymous cookie ID
   and based on the pages you have visited. Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1
   sentence 1 lit f GDPR, this serves to safeguard our legitimate
   interests in an optimal marketing of our website that are overriding in
   the process of balancing of interests. After the end of our use of the
   LinkedIn Insight & Conversion Tag, the data collected in this context
   will be deleted.

   You can disable the remarketing cookie via this link. You can also
   contact the Digital Advertising Alliance to find out how to set cookies
   and to make the relevant settings.

Twitter Ads & Conversion

   Through our advertising partner Twitter, Inc., we advertise this
   website on the Twitter platform (www.twitter.com). When you visit our
   website, a cookie from this provider is automatically set, which
   enables interest-based advertising by means of a pseudonymous cookie ID
   and based on the pages you have visited. Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1
   sentence 1 lit f GDPR, this serves to safeguard our legitimate
   interests in an optimal marketing of our website that are overriding in
   the process of balancing of interests. After the end of our use of
   Twitter the data collected in this context will be deleted.

   You can disable the remarketing cookie via this link. You can also
   contact the Digital Advertising Alliance to find out how to set cookies
   and to make the relevant settings.

Advertising via the pixel of the social network Facebook

   On this website the Facebook pixel is integrated. We use the following
   functions of the Facebook Pixel for the specified purposes:
     * Facebook Connect, analysis of access data for the purposes of
       interest-based advertising on Facebook;
     * Facebook Custom Audience, analysis of access data for purposes of
       targeted advertising to third parties on Facebook;
     * Facebook Events, analysis of access data for the purpose of
       advertising upcoming events;
     * Facebook Pixel Remarketing, analysis of the access data of product
       pages for the purpose of displaying interest-based advertising on
       Facebook;
     * Facebook Pixel Tracking, analysis of access data for the purpose of
       interest-based advertising on Facebook;
     * Facebook Pixel Conversions, analysis of the conversion data at
       order completion (order value, currency, indication of whether
       existing or new customer) for purposes of interest-based
       advertising on Facebook and the billing of these.

   The Facebook pixel automatically sets a cookie when you visit our
   website, which automatically uses a pseudonymous cookie ID and the
   pages you visit to enable the above functions for the purposes
   explained. Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f GDPR, this
   serves to safeguard our legitimate interests in an optimal marketing of
   our website that are overriding in the process of balancing of
   interests. The data collected in this context will be deleted once the
   Facebook services have ceased to be used for their intended purpose and
   at the end of their use.

   The Facebook Pixel is a service of Facebook, Inc. (www.facebook.com).
   Facebook, Inc. is headquartered in the USA and is certified under the
   EU-US Privacy Shield. A current certificate can be viewed here. As a
   result of this agreement between the US and the European Commission,
   the latter has established an adequate level of data protection for
   companies certified under the Privacy Shield.

   The contradiction and a complete deactivation of the Facebook pixel is
   possible via the following link. Clicking on the opt-out link sets an
   opt-out cookie (persistent HTML5 storage object) with an unlimited
   validity period, which prevents any traffic through the Facebook pixel.
   This only applies to the browser currently in use on the mobile device
   and must be repeated for any other browser if necessary: Disable web
   tracking.

   You can also object to this processing of your data by contacting
   the Digital Advertising Alliance to find out about the setting of
   cookies and to make the relevant settings. After your objection, an
   opt-out cookie may be stored on your terminal. If you delete your
   cookies, you must click the links explained here again.

7. Social Media PlugIns

Use of the social plugins from Facebook, Google, Twitter, Instagram,
Pinterest using the Shariff solution

   On our website social buttons are used by social networks.

   In order to increase the protection of your data when you visit our
   website, these buttons are not fully integrated into the page as
   plug-ins, but only by using an HTML link. This integration ensures that
   no connection to the servers of the provider of the respective social
   network is established when a page of our website containing such
   buttons is called up.

   Click on one of the buttons, a new window of your browser opens and
   calls up the page of the respective service provider, on which you can
   (if necessary after entering your login data) e.g. press the Like or
   Share button. The purpose and scope of the data collection and the
   further processing and use of the data by the providers on their pages
   as well as the possibility of contact and your relevant rights and
   setting options for the protection of your privacy can be found in the
   data protection information of the providers.

   http://www.facebook.com/policy.php
   https://twitter.com/privacy
   http://www.google.com/intl/en/+/policy/+1button.html
   https://help.instagram.com/155833707900388
   https://policy.pinterest.com/en/privacy-policy


Youtube Video Plugins

   This website integrates content via the video platform service
   Youtube. Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f GDPR, this serves
   to safeguard our legitimate interests in an optimal presentation of our
   offer that are overriding in the process of balancing of interests.

   Youtube is operated by Google LLC (www.google.com). Google LLC is
   headquartered in the USA and is certified under the EU-US Privacy
   Shield. A current certificate can be viewed here. As a result of this
   agreement between the US and the European Commission, the latter has
   established an adequate level of data protection for companies
   certified under the Privacy Shield.

   For videos from Youtube, which are integrated on our site, the extended
   data protection setting is activated. This means that no information
   from website visitors is collected and stored on YouTube unless they
   play the video. The purpose and scope of the data collection and the
   further processing and use of the data by the providers as well as your
   relevant rights and setting options for the protection of your privacy
   can be found in the data protection information of
   Google http://www.google.com/intl/en/+/policy/+1button.html.".

Vimeo Video Plugins

   This website integrates content via the video platform service Vimeo.

   Vimeo is operated by Vimeo LLC, 555 West 18th Street, New York 10011,
   USA ("Vimeo"). Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f GDPR, this
   serves to safeguard our legitimate interests in an optimal presentation
   of our offer that are overriding in the process of balancing of
   interests.

   The tracking tool Google Analytics is automatically integrated in
   videos from Vimeo that are integrated on our site. We have no influence
   on the settings of tracking and the analysis results collected in this
   way and cannot see them. In addition, web beacons are set for website
   visitors by embedding Vimeo videos.

   In order to prevent the use of Google Analytics tracking cookies, you
   may refuse the use of cookies by selecting the appropriate settings on
   your browser, however please note that if you do this you may not be
   able to use the full functionality of this website. You can also
   prevent Google from collecting the data generated by the cookie and
   relating to your use of the website (including your IP address) and
   from processing this data by Google by downloading and installing the
   browser plug-in available under the following
   link: http://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout?hl=en

   As an alternative to the browser plugin, you can click this link to
   prevent Google Analytics from collecting data on this website in the
   future. An opt-out cookie is stored on your mobile device. If you
   delete your cookies, you must click the link again. The purpose and
   scope of the data collection and the further processing and use of the
   data by the providers as well as your relevant rights and setting
   options for the protection of your privacy can be found in Vimeo's data
   protection information at https://vimeo.com/privacy

8. Pixel of the VG WORT

   On some of our websites the pixel of VG WORT is integrated, via which
   we record the page accesses in order to report them to the
   Verwertungsgesellschaft Wort (VG Wort). This serves the purpose of
   enabling our authors to participate in the distributions of VG WORT and
   is based on our legal obligation to ensure the legal remuneration for
   the use of copyrighted works pursuant to Section 53 UrhG in accordance
   with art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. c GDPR.

9. Sending rating reminders by e-mail

   If you have given us your express consent to this during or after your
   order in accordance with art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. a GDPR, we will
   use your e-mail address to send you an evaluation reminder by e-mail.

   The consent can be revoked at any time by sending a message to the
   contact option described below with effect for the future.

10. Contact possibilities and your rights

   As a data subject, you have the following rights:

   in accordance with art. 15 GDPR, you have the right to request
   information about your personal data processed by us to the extent
   described therein;

   in accordance with art. 16 GDPR, you have the right to demand the
   immediate correction of incorrect or complete personal data stored by
   us;

   in accordance with art. 17 GDPR, the right to request the deletion of
   your personal data stored with us, unless further processing
     * to exercise freedom of expression and information;
     * for the fulfilment of a legal obligation;
     * for reasons of public interest; or
     * for asserting, exercising or defending legal claims

   is required;

   in accordance with art. 18 GDPR, the right to request the restriction
   of the processing of your personal data, insofar as
     * the correctness of the data is denied by you;
     * the processing is unlawful, but you refuse to delete it;
     * we no longer need the data, but you do need it to assert, exercise
       or defend legal claims, or
     * you have lodged an objection to the processing pursuant to art. 21
       GDPR;

   In accordance with art. 20 GDPR, you have the right to receive your
   personal data that you have provided to us in a structured, current and
   machine-readable format or to request its transfer to another person
   responsible;

   the right to complain to a supervisory authority pursuant to art. 77
   GDPR. You can also contact the supervisory authority at your usual
   place of residence or workplace or at our company headquarters.

   If you have any questions regarding the collection, processing or use
   of your personal data, information, correction, restriction of the
   processing or deletion of data or revocation of any consent given or
   objection to a specific use of data, please contact our company data
   protection officer.

   Data Protection Officer
   Subbelrather Str. 15c
   50823 Cologne
   privacy@trustedshops.com

   Right of objection

   Insofar as we process personal data as described above in order to
   protect our legitimate interests that are overriding in the process of
   balancing of interests, you can object to this processing with effect
   for the future. If the data is processed for direct marketing purposes,
   you can exercise this right at any time as described above. If the
   processing takes place for other purposes, you are only entitled to a
   right of objection if there are reasons arising from your particular
   situation.

   After exercising your right of objection, we will not process your
   personal data further for these purposes, unless we can prove
   compelling reasons worthy of protection for the processing, which
   outweigh your interests, rights and freedoms, or if the processing
   serves to assert, exercise or defend legal claims.

   This does not apply if the processing is for direct marketing purposes.
   Then we will not process your personal data for this purpose.

Imprint

   Person responsible under § 5 of Germany’s Telemedia Act (TMG) for
   www.trustedshops.eu is:

Registered office

   Trusted Shops GmbH
   Subbelrather Straße 15c
   50823 Cologne, Germany

   Tel.: +49 221 77536 371

   E-Mail: service@trustedshops.eu

   Cologne Local Court, Germany, Commercial Register (HRB) 32735

   VAT ID No.: DE 812 947 877

   Managing Directors: Jean-Marc Noël, Thomas Karst, Ulrich Hafenbradl

   Responsible for content: Ulrich Hafenbradl (responsible), Dr. Carsten
   Föhlisch

   Representative for minor protection, pursuant to Article 7 JMStV:
   Stefan Bodewig, jugendschutz@trustedshops.de
   Online dispute resolution according to Art. 14 (1) Regulation on
   consumer ODR: The European Commission provides a platform for online
   dispute resolutions (ODR) which can be accessed under
   http://ec.europa.eu/consumers/odr/. Consumers have the possibility to
   use this platform for resolving their disputes. We are ready to
   participate in extra-judicial dispute settlement proceedings before a
   consumer dispute resolution body.

   Trusted Shops Logo
   © 1999-2019 TRUSTED SHOPS GmbH. [flag_en-EU.png]

     * [flag_fr-BE.png] Belgique / België
     * [flag_en-DK.png] Danmark
     * [flag_de-DE.png] Deutschland
     * [flag_es-ES.png] España
     * [flag_fr-FR.png] France
     * [flag_it-IT.png] Italia
     * [flag_nl-NL.png] Nederland
     * [flag_de-AT.png] Österreich
     * [flag_pl-PL.png] Polska
     * [flag_de-CH.png] Schweiz
     * [flag_en-SE.png] Sverige
     * [flag_en-GB.png] United Kingdom
     * [flag_en-EU.png] Rest of Europe
     *

   All rights reserved. Contact, FAQ, Data privacy and Imprint

   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-TPWN9Q
   #alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate

     * Shops
     * Trustmark
     * Buyer protection
     * Customer reviews
     * Contact us
     * For retailers

     * Shopper-Login
     * For retailers

Imprint

   Person responsible under § 5 of Germany’s Telemedia Act (TMG)
   for http://www.trustedshops.eu.

   Trusted Shops GmbH
   Colonius Carré
   Subbelrather Straße 15c
   50823 Cologne, Germany

   Tel.: +49 (0)221 – 77 53 66
   Fax: +49 (0)221 – 77 53 6 89
   E-mail: info@trustedshops.com

   Cologne Local Court, Germany,
   Commercial Register (HRB) 32735
   VAT ID No.: DE 812 947 877

   Managing Directors:
   Jean-Marc Noël, Thomas Karst, Ulrich Hafenbradl
   Responsible for content:
   Ulrich Hafenbradl (responsible), Dr. Carsten Föhlisch

   Representative for minor protection, pursuant to Article 7 JMStV:
   Stefan Bodewig, jugendschutz@trustedshops.de

   Trusted Shops GmbH is registered in the Brokers’ Register under
   Register Number [D-B6MZ-QKA67-38]  as a licensed insurance agent
   pursuant to section 34d subsection 1 GewO (German Industrial Code)
   (www.vermittlerregister.info). The competent licensing and supervisory
   authority is the Cologne Chamber of Industry and Commerce, Unter
   Sachsenhausen 10-26, 50667 Cologne (https://ihk-koeln.de/). Trusted
   Shops GmbH is a member the Cologne Chamber of Industry and Commerce.

   Professional regulations governing insurance brokerage:
   – section 34d Gewerbeordnung (GewO): German Industrial Code
   – sections 59 – 68 Versicherungsvertragsgesetz (VVG): German Insurance
   Contract Act
   – Versicherungsvermittlungsverordnung (VersVermV): German Insurance
   Brokerage Ordinance

   The professional regulations can be viewed and downloaded from
   www.gesetze-im-internet.de, the homepage operated by the German Federal
   Ministry of Justice together with juris GmbH.

   Information on resolving disputes

   Information on online dispute resolution pursuant to Article 14 para. 1
   ODR Regulation: The European Commission provides a platform for online
   dispute resolutions (ODR) which can be accessed
   under http://ec.europa.eu/consumers/odr/. Consumers have the
   possibility to use this platform for resolving their disputes. We are
   ready to participate in extra-judicial dispute settlement proceedings
   before a consumer dispute resolution body.

   Information on the resolution of disputes pursuant to section 214 VVG
   in conjunction with the VVG Regulation governing Conciliation Bodies

   As insurance brokers, Trusted Shops GmbH are obliged by section 214 of
   the German Insurance Contract Act (VVG) in conjunction with the VVG
   Regulation governing Conciliation Bodies to participate in dispute
   resolution procedures. The competent body is as follows:

   Versicherungsombudsmann e.V.,
   Postfach 080632, 10006 Berlin (Germany)
   https://www.versicherungsombudsmann.de/


User Privacy Notice

   Thank you for your interest in our website. The protection of your
   privacy is very important to us. Below we inform you in detail about
   the handling of your data.

   [ ]

Access data and hosting

   You can visit our website without providing any personal information.
   With every visit of the website, the web server automatically saves a
   so-called server log file which, for example, contains the name of the
   requested file, your IP address, date and time of the call, the amount
   of data transmitted and the requesting provider (access data) and
   documents the call. For the purpose of a shorter loading time we also
   use a Content Delivery Network (“CDN”) for delivering our web assets
   via web servers of that CDN provider, who is working for us by means of
   an order processing agreement. Access data is also collected
   accordingly on the provider’s web servers.

   These access data are evaluated exclusively for the purpose of ensuring
   trouble-free operation of the site and improving our services. This
   serves according to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f GDPR the protection
   of our legitimate interests in the proper presentation of our offer
   that are overriding in the process of balancing of interests. All
   access data will be deleted no later than seven days after the end of
   your visit to the site.

   Third-party hosting services
   Within the framework of processing on our behalf, third party providers
   provide us with hosting and presentation services for our websites. We
   use the following service providers for hosting the respective website:

   etrusted.com/en: Raidboxes GmbH, Friedrich-Ebert-Straße 7, 41853
   Münster, DE

   trustedshops.co.uk: ANEXIA Internetdienstleistungs GmbH, Feldkirchener
   Straße 140, 9020 Klagenfurt am Wörtersee, Österreich

   business.trustedshops.co.uk: HubSpot, Inc., 25 First Street, 2nd Floor,
   Cambridge, MA 02141, USA

   shop.trustedshops.com/en: Timme Hosting GmbH & Co. KG, Ovelgönner Weg
   43, 21335 Lüneburg, DE

   If a service provider is based in the USA, it is certified under the
   EU-US Privacy Shield. A current certificate can be viewed here. As a
   result of this agreement between the US and the European Commission,
   the latter has established an adequate level of data protection for
   companies certified under the Privacy Shield. Further, we have agreed
   the application of EU standard data protection clauses with other
   service providers based in a country outside the EU or the EEA in order
   to provide suitable guarantees pursuant to art. 46 para. 2 lit. c GDPR.

   All data collected in the context of the use of these web pages or in
   forms provided for the purposes as described below are processed on the
   servers of the respective service provider. Processing on other servers
   only takes place as described within this privacy statement.
   [ ]

Data collection and use for the use of Trusted Shops products

   We collect personal data if you voluntarily provide it when contacting
   us (e.g. via contact form or e-mail). Mandatory fields are marked as
   such, since in these cases we require the data for processing your
   contact or opening of the customer account in accordance with art. 6
   para. 1 sentence 1 lit. b GDPR and you cannot send the contact without
   this information. Which data is collected can be seen from the
   respective input forms. We use the data provided by you to process your
   enquiries.

   We have engaged service providers for the technical processing of your
   inquiries on our behalf. These service providers are based in the USA
   and are certified under the EU-US Privacy Shield. As a result of this
   agreement between the US and the European Commission, the latter has
   established an adequate level of data protection for companies
   certified under the Privacy Shield.

   After complete processing of the inquiry, your data will be restricted
   for further processing and deleted after expiry of the storage periods
   under tax and commercial law, unless you have expressly consented to
   further use of your data or we reserve the right to use data beyond
   this, which is permitted by law and about which we inform you in this
   declaration.

   Live Chat Tool Userlike
   If you use the live chat tool to make contact, the data you voluntarily
   enter there (name, e-mail address, message) will be stored on our
   behalf at our service provider Userlike on servers within Germany. They
   will be processed there for the purpose of answering the inquiry by us
   and subsequently deleted in accordance with art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1
   lit. b GDPR.

   Registration for Trusted Shops buyer protection
   When subscribing for Trusted Shops buyer protection, we need your
   e-mail address, the total purchase price, the selected payment method,
   purchase order number, your customer number (if you have one) and the
   name of the online shop from which you ordered the product.

   Your data will be used within the scope of contract processing in
   accordance with art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. b GDPR for the purpose
   of providing the Trusted Shops buyer protection to you.

   Only in the event of a claim under the buyer protection we require
   additional information and personal data from you to review and process
   your claim for reimbursement. When registering a refund claim, your
   name, address, telephone number and bank account will be charged for
   the refund.

   With the buyer protection you also get access to the Trusted Shops
   customer login (My Trusted Shops). In the Trusted Shops customer login
   you can see your active and concluded buyer protection contracts,
   submit refund applications and submit or change ratings for your
   orders. Your e-mail address serves as identification and user name for
   access to My Trusted Shops. You have the possibility to personalize
   your membership account by voluntarily entering further personal data
   such as your name, place of residence and/or a profile picture in the
   Trusted Shops customer login or when submitting a rating.

   Your submitted ratings can then be displayed with these additional
   details, although some details to protect your privacy are always only
   displayed in abridged form. Similarly, a summary of all assessments
   submitted can then be publicly retrieved. Your email address will not
   be publicly displayed. You can change or remove your personal data at
   any time in My Trusted Shops. You can also deactivate the public
   display of your profile there.

   After complete processing of the contract or deactivation of your
   customer account, your data will be restricted for further processing
   and deleted after expiry of the storage periods under tax and
   commercial law, unless you have expressly consented to further use of
   your data or we reserve the right to use data beyond this, which is
   permitted by law and about which we inform you in this declaration. You
   can deactivate your customer account at any time and either by sending
   a message to the contact option described below or using the function
   provided for this purpose in the customer account.

   Submitting a rating
   If you submit a rating via the Trusted Shops evaluation system, we and
   the evaluated company require your e-mail address within the framework
   of our user contract in accordance with art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit.
   b GDPR in order to ensure the validity and trustworthiness of the
   evaluation and to contact you in case of well-founded complaints and
   for verification of your submited rating. The e-mail address together
   with the order number and the evaluation submitted will be stored and
   submitted to the evaluated company for these purposes.

   When you submit a product review, the URL of the product and the
   product image, the product name, the product SKU, GTIN and MPN, and the
   manufacturer are also saved.

   In order to make the rating system secure, to prevent incorrect or
   falsified ratings and to ensure proper operation of the rating system,
   we also collect your IP address when you submit a rating. This serves
   to safeguard our legitimate interests in the prevention of misuse and
   the protection of our systems that are overriding in the process of
   balancing of interests in accordance with art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1
   lit. f GDPR. The IP address is stored for a maximum of 7 days for the
   evaluation and then deleted.

   Social login via Facebook or Google
   You can link your Trusted Shops buyers account to your Facebook or
   Google account.

   Facebook, Inc. and Google LLC are based in the USA. They are certified
   under the EU-US Privacy Shield. A current certificate can be
   viewed here. As a result of this agreement between the US and the
   European Commission, the latter has established an adequate level of
   data protection for companies certified under the Privacy Shield.

   In case of a link between the accounts, you will only need to
   authenticate to Facebook or Google using your login information to be
   logged into your Trusted Shops customer account for buyers. For this
   purpose, you will be asked to consent to the transmission of the
   following data to Trusted Shops the first time you create a link:

   Facebook: E-mail address, name, profile photo, age range (e.g. 35-39),
   language, country and other data that you have set to public on your
   Facebook profile.

   Google: E-mail address, name, profile photo and other data that you
   have posted on your Google profile as publicly available.

   The data Trusted Shops receives from Facebook or Google will be used to
   help you design your shopper profile on the basis of your consent
   pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. a GDPR. Facebook receives
   the e-mail address from Trusted Shops the first time it is linked in
   order to identify you as a user, and afterwards only the ID that has
   been set as an authentication feature for you between the two systems.
   Facebook or Google does not receive any further data. You can unlink
   the accounts at any time and revoke the transfer of data with future
   effect by changing your settings on Facebook (here) or Google (here).

   Registration for Trusted Shops membership for online merchants
   An application for membership for online merchants is only offered to
   persons acting in the exercise of their commercial or self-employed
   professional activity. Personal data is collected for the purpose of
   contract processing in accordance with art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. b
   GDPR if you voluntarily provide it to us when contacting us or
   registering for our services.

   After complete processing of the contract, your data will be restricted
   for further processing and deleted after expiry of the storage periods
   under tax and commercial law, unless you have expressly consented to
   further use of your data or we reserve the right to use data beyond
   this, which is permitted by law and about which we inform you in this
   declaration.

   Application for a job at Trusted Shops
   If you apply for a position at Trusted Shops via this website, personal
   data will be collected in our application portal for the purpose of
   handling the evaluation process in accordance with art. 6 para. 1
   sentence 1 lit. b GDPR.

   This portal is operated by a service provider who processes the data
   collected on its servers on our behalf .

   The data you provide in our application portal will be used exclusively
   for the purpose of filling the advertised position and checking and
   processing your application submitted in this context. After completion
   of the application process, this data will be blocked for further use
   and deleted upon expiry of any storage obligations, unless you
   expressly consent to any other processing.
   [ ]

Data transfer

   If you have ordered goods which we will send to you by post, we will
   pass on the data required for the fulfilment of the contract in
   accordance with art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. b GDPR to the shipping
   company commissioned with the delivery if this is necessary for the
   delivery of ordered goods. Depending on which payment service provider
   you select in the order process, we pass on the payment data collected
   for the processing of payments to the credit institution commissioned
   with the payment and, if applicable, to payment service providers
   commissioned by us or to the selected payment service. In some cases,
   the selected payment service providers also collect this data
   themselves if you create an account there. In this case, you must log
   in to the payment service provider with your access data during the
   ordering process. The data protection declaration of the respective
   payment service provider applies in this respect.

   We use a payment service provider based in a country outside the
   European Union. The transmission of personal data to this company only
   takes place within the scope of the necessity to fulfil the contract.

   Credit check when registering for Trusted Shops membership for online
   merchants
   Only if you act in the exercise of your commercial or self-employed
   professional activity, we transmit your address data to credit agencies
   when concluding a membership contract for online merchants for the
   purpose of assessing the liability risk and for credit assessment if
   necessary. This serves to settle the contractual relationship pursuant
   to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. b GDPR.

   We transfer the personal data required for a credit assessment to the
   following company(s):

   Verband der Vereine Creditreform e.V.
   Hellersbergstr. 12
   D-41460 Neuss, Germany

   Appropriate measures to protect your rights, freedoms and legitimate
   interests will be taken into account. You have the opportunity to make
   your views known and to challenge the decision by contacting the
   contact person described below.
   [ ]

E-mail newsletter and postal advertising

   E-mail advertising with registration for the newsletter
   If you register for one of our newsletters or provide your data in
   order to download a document free of charge from our website or our
   Facebook or LinkedIn presence, we use the data required for this or
   separately provided by you in order to regularly send you our e-mail
   newsletter on the basis of your consent in accordance with art. 6 para.
   1 sentence 1 lit. a GDPR.

   The newsletter is sent on our behalf by service providers to whom we
   pass on your e-mail address for this purpose.

   If the newsletter is sent via a service provider based in the USA, it
   is certified under the EU-US Privacy Shield. As a result of this
   agreement between the US and the European Commission, the latter has
   established an adequate level of data protection for companies
   certified under the Privacy Shield.

   You can unsubscribe from the newsletter at any time and either by
   sending a message to the contact option described below or via a link
   provided for this purpose in the newsletter. After deregistration, we
   delete your e-mail address unless you have expressly consented to
   further use of your data or we reserve the right to use data beyond
   this, which is permitted by law and about which we inform you in this
   declaration.

   E-mail advertising without registration for the newsletter and your
   right of objection
   If we receive your e-mail address in connection with the sale of a
   product or service and you have not objected to this, we reserve the
   right to regularly send you offers for similar products, such as those
   already purchased, from our range by e-mail in accordance with Section
   7 (3) UWG. This serves to safeguard our legitimate interests in an
   advertising approach to our customers that are overriding in the
   process of balancing of interests in accordance with art. 6 para. 1
   sentence 1 lit. f GDPR.

   The newsletter is sent on our behalf by service providers to whom we
   pass on your e-mail address for this purpose.

   If the newsletter is sent via a service provider based in the USA, it
   is certified under the EU-US Privacy Shield. As a result of this
   agreement between the US and the European Commission, the latter has
   established an adequate level of data protection for companies
   certified under the Privacy Shield.

   You can object to this use of your e-mail address at any time by
   sending a message to the contact option described below or via a link
   provided for this purpose in the advertising e-mail.

   Postal advertising and your right of objection
   Furthermore, we reserve the right to use your first and last name as
   well as your postal address for our own advertising purposes, e.g. to
   send interesting offers and information about our products by post.
   This serves to safeguard our legitimate interests in an advertising
   approach to our customers that are overriding in the process of
   balancing of interests in accordance with art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1
   lit. f GDPR.

   The advertising mailings are processed on our behalf by a service
   provider to whom we pass on your data.

   You can object to the storage and use of your data for these purposes
   at any time by sending a message to the contact option described below.
   [ ]

Integration of the Trusted Shops Trustbadge

   To display our ratings collected, the Trusted Shops Trustbadge is
   integrated on some of our websites.

   Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. f GDPR, this serves to
   safeguard our legitimate interests in the optimal marketing of our
   offer that are overriding in the process of balancing of interests. The
   Trustbadge and the services advertised with it are an offer of Trusted
   Shops GmbH, Subbelrather Str. 15C, 50823 Cologne.

   When the Trustbadge is called, the web server automatically saves a
   so-called server log file, which contains e.g. your IP address, date
   and time of the call, transferred data volume and the requesting
   provider (access data) and documents the call. This access data is not
   evaluated and is automatically overwritten at the latest seven days
   after the end of your page visit.
   [ ]

Cookies

   To improve the user experience on our website and enable you to use its
   certain features in order to show suitable products or conduct market
   research, some pages of this website use the so-called cookies. This
   serves the protection of our legitimate interests in the optimised
   presentation of our offer according to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f
   GDPR that are overriding in the process of balancing of interests. A
   cookie is a small text file which is stored automatically on your end
   device. Some of the cookies we use are deleted after you close the
   browser session, i.e. when you close the browser (that’s the so-called
   session cookies). Other cookies are stored in your end-user device and
   enable us to recognise your browser when you visit us again (persistent
   cookies). To check the cookie storage period, you can use the Overview
   function in the cookie settings of your web browser. You can configure
   your browser for it to inform you whenever a page uses cookies and
   decide on a case-by-case basis whether to accept or reject the cookies
   on a given website or generally. Every browser has a different policy
   for managing the cookie settings. The browser’s policy is described in
   the Help menu of every browser and explains how you can change your
   cookie settings. To find out how to change the settings in your
   browser, see the links below:

   Internet Explorer™:
   https://support.microsoft.com/en-gb/help/17442/windows-internet-explore
   r-delete-manage-cookies
   Safari™:
   https://support.apple.com/kb/PH21411?locale=de_DE&viewlocale=en_US
   Chrome™: https://support.google.com/chrome/answer/95647?hl=en&hlrm=en
   Firefox™:
   https://support.mozilla.org/en-US/kb/enable-and-disable-cookies-website
   -preferences
   Opera™ : http://help.opera.com/Windows/10.20/en/cookies.html

   Please note that disabling cookies may limit your access to some
   features of our website.

a. Web analysis

   Use of Google (Universal) Analytics for web analysis
   For website analysis, this website uses Google (Universal) Analytics, a
   web analysis service of Google LLC (www.google.de). Pursuant to art. 6
   para. 1 sentence 1 lit f GDPR, this serves to safeguard our legitimate
   interests in an optimised presentation of our offer that are overriding
   in the process of balancing of interests. Google (Universal) Analytics
   uses methods that enable an analysis of your use of the website, such
   as cookies. The automatically collected information about your use of
   this website is usually transferred to a Google server in the USA and
   stored there. By activating IP anonymisation on this website, the IP
   address is shortened prior to transmission within the Member States of
   the European Union or in other states party to the Agreement on the
   European Economic Area. Only in exceptional cases will the full IP
   address be transmitted to a Google server in the USA and shortened
   there. The anonymous IP address transmitted by your browser within the
   framework of Google Analytics is not merged with other Google data.
   After the end of the use of Google Analytics by us the data collected
   in this context will be deleted.

   Google LLC is headquartered in the USA and is certified under the EU-US
   Privacy Shield. A current certificate can be viewed here. As a result
   of this agreement between the US and the European Commission, the
   latter has established an adequate level of data protection for
   companies certified under the Privacy Shield.

   You can prevent Google from collecting the data generated by the cookie
   and relating to your use of the website (including your IP address) and
   from processing this data by Google by downloading and installing the
   browser plug-in available under the following link:
   http://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout?hl=en. As an alternative to the
   browser plugin, you can click this link to prevent Google Analytics
   from collecting data on this website in the future. An opt-out cookie
   is stored on your mobile device. If you delete your cookies, you must
   click the link again.

   Use of Hubspot for web analysis
   For website analysis purposes, Hubspot, Inc. (www.hubspot.com)
   Automatically collects and stores data from which user profiles are
   created using pseudonyms. Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f
   GDPR, this serves to safeguard our legitimate interests in an optimised
   presentation of our offer that are overriding in the process of
   balancing of interests. Cookies may be used for this purpose. After the
   end of the use of Hubspot by us, the data collected in this context
   will be deleted.

   Hubspot, Inc. is headquartered in the USA and is certified under the
   EU-US Privacy Shield. A current certificate can be viewed here. As a
   result of this agreement between the US and the European Commission,
   the latter has established an adequate level of data protection for
   companies certified under the Privacy Shield.

   You can object to the collection and storage of data at any time with
   future effect by storing an opt-out cookie on your device or by
   suppressing the functionality of the tool with the help of an
   appropriate browser plugin, e.g. Ghostery.

   Use of Hotjar for web analysis
   For website analysis purposes, data is automatically collected and
   stored on this website using technologies of Hojar Limited
   (www.hotjar.com), from which user profiles are created using
   pseudonyms. Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f GDPR, this
   serves to safeguard our legitimate interests in an optimised
   presentation of our offer that are overriding in the process of
   balancing of interests. Cookies may be used for this purpose. The
   pseudonymised user profiles are not combined with personal data about
   the bearer of the pseudonym without express consent to be given
   separately. After the end of the use of Hotjar by us the data collected
   in this context will be deleted. You can object to the collection and
   storage of data at any time with future effect by clicking this link.

   After your objection, an opt-out cookie is stored on your mobile
   device. If you delete your cookies, you must click the link again.

   Use of Optimizely for web analysis and A/B tests
   For website analysis and A/B tests, data is automatically collected and
   stored on this website with technologies of Optimizely GmbH
   (www.optimizely.com), from which user profiles are created using
   pseudonyms. Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f GDPR, this
   serves to safeguard our legitimate interests in an optimised
   presentation of our offer that are overriding in the process of
   balancing of interests. Cookies may be used for this purpose. The
   pseudonymised user profiles are not combined with personal data about
   the bearer of the pseudonym without express consent to be given
   separately. After the end of our use of Optimizely the data collected
   in this context will be deleted. You can object to the collection and
   storage of data at any time with future effect by clicking this link.

   After your objection, an opt-out cookie is stored on your mobile
   device. If you delete your cookies, you must click the link again.

   Use of Tealium
   This website uses technologies from Tealium, Inc. (www.tealium.com)
   Automatically collected and stored data from which user profiles are
   created using pseudonyms. Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f
   GDPR, this serves to safeguard our legitimate interests in an optimised
   presentation of our offer that are overriding in the process of
   balancing of interests. Cookies may be used for this purpose. The data
   collected in this context will be deleted once we have ceased using
   Tealium for its intended purpose and at the end of its use.

   Tealium, Inc. is headquartered in the USA and is certified under the
   EU-US Privacy Shield. A current certificate can be viewed here. As a
   result of this agreement between the US and the European Commission,
   the latter has established an adequate level of data protection for
   companies certified under the Privacy Shield.

   You can object to the collection and storage of data at any time with
   future effect by storing an opt-out cookie on your device or by
   suppressing the functionality of the tool with the help of an
   appropriate browser plugin, e.g. Ghostery.

b. Advertising via marketing networks

   Google Tag Manager
   We use the Google Tag Manager to manage usage-based advertising
   services. The Tag Manager itself is a cookie-free domain and does not
   collect any personal data. Rather, the tool triggers other tags that
   may in turn collect data (see above). If you have disabled at the
   domain or cookie level, it will remain for all tracking tags
   implemented with Google Tag Manager.

   Google Double Click
   This website uses the so-called DoubleClick cookie as part of the
   Google Analytics application, which enables your browser to be
   recognised when you visit other websites. Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1
   sentence 1 lit f GDPR, this serves to safeguard our legitimate
   interests in an optimal marketing of our website that are overriding in
   the process of balancing of interests. The information automatically
   generated by the cookie about your visit to this website is transferred
   to a Google server in the USA and stored there. The IP address will be
   reduced by activating IP anonymisation on this website prior to
   transmission within the Member States of the European Union or in other
   states party to the Agreement on the European Economic Area. Only in
   exceptional cases will the full IP address be transmitted to a Google
   server in the USA and shortened there. The anonymous IP address
   transmitted by your browser as part of Google Analytics will not be
   merged with other Google data. After the end of the use of the Google
   services by us the data collected in this context will be deleted.

   Google Double Click is a service of Google LLC. (www.google.de). Google
   LLC is headquartered in the USA and is certified under the EU-US
   Privacy Shield. A current certificate can be viewed here. As a result
   of this agreement between the US and the European Commission, the
   latter has established an adequate level of data protection for
   companies certified under the Privacy Shield.

   You can disable the DoubleClick cookie using this link. You can also
   contact the Digital Advertising Alliance to find out how to set cookies
   and to make the relevant settings. Finally, you can set your browser so
   that you are informed about the setting of cookies and decide
   individually whether to accept them or to exclude the acceptance of
   cookies for certain cases or in general. If cookies are not accepted,
   the functionality of our website may be limited.

   Google AdSense
   Our site uses Google AdSense to market space for third-party ads and
   advertising networks. These ads are displayed in various places on this
   website. As part of the integration of Google AdSense, the so-called
   DoubleClick cookie is set by Google for all page visitors. This enables
   the display of interest-compatible advertising by automatically
   assigning a pseudonymous UserID, with the help of which the interests
   are determined on the basis of visits to this and other websites.
   Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f GDPR, this serves to
   safeguard our legitimate interests in an optimal marketing of our
   website that are overriding in the process of balancing of
   interests. After the end of the use of the Google services by us the
   data collected in this context will be deleted.

   Google AdSense is a service of Google LLC (www.google.de). Google LLC
   is headquartered in the USA and is certified under the EU-US Privacy
   Shield. A current certificate can be viewed here. As a result of this
   agreement between the US and the European Commission, the latter has
   established an adequate level of data protection for companies
   certified under the Privacy Shield.

   You can disable the cookie using this link. You can also contact the
   Digital Advertising Alliance to find out how to set cookies and to make
   the relevant settings.

   Google AdWords Remarketing and Google Analytics Audiences
   We use Google Adwords Remarketing and Google Analytics Audiences to
   advertise this website in Google search results and on third-party
   websites. When you visit our website, Google sets the so-called
   remarketing cookie or additionally uses the Google Analytics cookie. In
   this case, both cookies automatically enable interest-based advertising
   by means of a pseudonymous CookieID and on the basis of the pages you
   have visited. After our use of Google AdWords Remarketing and Google
   Analytics has ceased and has ended, the data collected in this context
   will be deleted. Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f GDPR, the
   use of these tools serves to safeguard our legitimate interests in an
   optimal marketing of our website that are overriding in the process of
   balancing of interests. After the end of the use of the Google services
   by us the data collected in this context will be deleted.

   Any additional processing will only take place if you have agreed with
   Google that your web and app browsing history will be linked to your
   Google Account and information from your Google Account will be used to
   personalise ads you see on the web. If you are logged in to Google
   while visiting our website, Google will use your data together with
   Google Analytics data to create and define target group lists for
   cross-device remarketing. To this end, Google temporarily links your
   personal data with Google Analytics data to form target groups.

   Google AdWords Remarketing and Google Analytics are services of Google
   LLC (www.google.com). Google LLC is headquartered in the USA and is
   certified under the EU-US Privacy Shield. A current certificate can be
   viewed here. As a result of this agreement between the US and the
   European Commission, the latter has established an adequate level of
   data protection for companies certified under the Privacy Shield.

   You can disable the remarketing cookie via this link. You can also
   click this link to prevent future collection by Google Analytics on
   this website. An opt-out cookie is stored on your mobile device. If you
   delete your cookies, you must click the link again.

   You can also contact the Digital Advertising Alliance to find out how
   to set cookies and to make the relevant settings.

   AdRoll Retargeting
   Through our advertising partner AdRoll Advertising Limited, Level 6, 1,
   Burlington Plaza, Burlington Road, Dublin 4, Ireland, we advertise this
   website in search results and on third-party websites. When you visit
   our website, a cookie from these providers or their partners is
   automatically set, which enables interest-based advertising by means of
   a pseudonymous cookie ID and on the basis of the pages you visit.
   Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f GDPR, this serves to
   safeguard our legitimate interests in an optimal marketing of our
   website that are overriding in the process of balancing of
   interests. After the end of our use of AdRoll Retargeting, the data
   collected in this context will be deleted.

   You can disable the retargeting cookie by clicking on one of the
   following links: https://app.adroll.com/optout/safari.

   Alternatively, you can disable the use of cookies by third parties by
   visiting the opt-out page of the Digital Advertising Alliance.

   LinkedIn Insight & Conversion Tag
   Through our advertising partner LinkedIn Corporation, we advertise this
   website on the LinkedIn platform (www.linkedin.com). When you visit our
   website, a cookie from this provider is automatically set, which
   enables interest-based advertising by means of a pseudonymous cookie ID
   and based on the pages you have visited. Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1
   sentence 1 lit f GDPR, this serves to safeguard our legitimate
   interests in an optimal marketing of our website that are overriding in
   the process of balancing of interests. After the end of our use of the
   LinkedIn Insight & Conversion Tag, the data collected in this context
   will be deleted.

   You can disable the remarketing cookie via this link. You can also
   contact the Digital Advertising Alliance to find out how to set cookies
   and to make the relevant settings.

   Twitter Ads & Conversion
   Through our advertising partner Twitter, Inc., we advertise this
   website on the Twitter platform (www.twitter.com). When you visit our
   website, a cookie from this provider is automatically set, which
   enables interest-based advertising by means of a pseudonymous cookie ID
   and based on the pages you have visited. Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1
   sentence 1 lit f GDPR, this serves to safeguard our legitimate
   interests in an optimal marketing of our website that are overriding in
   the process of balancing of interests. After the end of our use of
   Twitter the data collected in this context will be deleted.

   You can disable the remarketing cookie via this link. You can also
   contact the Digital Advertising Alliance to find out how to set cookies
   and to make the relevant settings.

   Advertising via the pixel of the social network Facebook
   On this website the Facebook pixel is integrated. We use the following
   functions of the Facebook Pixel for the specified purposes:
     * Facebook Connect, analysis of access data for the purposes of
       interest-based advertising on Facebook;
     * Facebook Custom Audience, analysis of access data for purposes of
       targeted advertising to third parties on Facebook;
     * Facebook Events, analysis of access data for the purpose of
       advertising upcoming events;
     * Facebook Pixel Remarketing, analysis of the access data of product
       pages for the purpose of displaying interest-based advertising on
       Facebook;
     * Facebook Pixel Tracking, analysis of access data for the purpose of
       interest-based advertising on Facebook;
     * Facebook Pixel Conversions, analysis of the conversion data at
       order completion (order value, currency, indication of whether
       existing or new customer) for purposes of interest-based
       advertising on Facebook and the billing of these.

   The Facebook pixel automatically sets a cookie when you visit our
   website, which automatically uses a pseudonymous cookie ID and the
   pages you visit to enable the above functions for the purposes
   explained. Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f GDPR, this
   serves to safeguard our legitimate interests in an optimal marketing of
   our website that are overriding in the process of balancing of
   interests. The data collected in this context will be deleted once the
   Facebook services have ceased to be used for their intended purpose and
   at the end of their use.

   The Facebook Pixel is a service of Facebook, Inc. (www.facebook.com).
   Facebook, Inc. is headquartered in the USA and is certified under the
   EU-US Privacy Shield. A current certificate can be viewed here. As a
   result of this agreement between the US and the European Commission,
   the latter has established an adequate level of data protection for
   companies certified under the Privacy Shield.

   You can object to the collection and storage of data at any time with
   future effect by storing an opt-out cookie on your device or by
   suppressing the functionality of the tool with the help of an
   appropriate browser plugin, e.g. Ghostery.

   You can also object to this processing of your data by contacting the
   Digital Advertising Alliance to find out about the setting of cookies
   and to make the relevant settings. After your objection, an opt-out
   cookie may be stored on your terminal. If you delete your cookies, you
   must click the links explained here again.
   [ ]

Social Media PlugIns

   Use of the social plugins from Facebook, Google, Twitter, Instagram,
   Pinterest using the Shariff solution
   On our website social buttons are used by social networks.

   In order to increase the protection of your data when you visit our
   website, these buttons are not fully integrated into the page as
   plug-ins, but only by using an HTML link. This integration ensures that
   no connection to the servers of the provider of the respective social
   network is established when a page of our website containing such
   buttons is called up.

   Click on one of the buttons, a new window of your browser opens and
   calls up the page of the respective service provider, on which you can
   (if necessary after entering your login data) e.g. press the Like or
   Share button. The purpose and scope of the data collection and the
   further processing and use of the data by the providers on their pages
   as well as the possibility of contact and your relevant rights and
   setting options for the protection of your privacy can be found in the
   data protection information of the providers.

   http://www.facebook.com/policy.php
   https://twitter.com/privacy
   http://www.google.com/intl/en/+/policy/+1button.html
   https://help.instagram.com/155833707900388
   https://policy.pinterest.com/en/privacy-policy

   Youtube Video Plugins
   This website integrates content via the video platform service
   Youtube. Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f GDPR, this serves
   to safeguard our legitimate interests in an optimal presentation of our
   offer that are overriding in the process of balancing of interests.

   Youtube is operated by Google LLC (www.google.com). Google LLC is
   headquartered in the USA and is certified under the EU-US Privacy
   Shield. A current certificate can be viewed here. As a result of this
   agreement between the US and the European Commission, the latter has
   established an adequate level of data protection for companies
   certified under the Privacy Shield.

   For videos from Youtube, which are integrated on our site, the extended
   data protection setting is activated. This means that no information
   from website visitors is collected and stored on YouTube unless they
   play the video. The purpose and scope of the data collection and the
   further processing and use of the data by the providers as well as your
   relevant rights and setting options for the protection of your privacy
   can be found in the data protection information of Google
   http://www.google.com/intl/en/+/policy/+1button.html.“.

   Vimeo Video Plugins
   This website integrates content via the video platform service Vimeo.

   Vimeo is operated by Vimeo LLC, 555 West 18th Street, New York 10011,
   USA („Vimeo“). Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f GDPR, this
   serves to safeguard our legitimate interests in an optimal presentation
   of our offer that are overriding in the process of balancing of
   interests.

   The tracking tool Google Analytics is automatically integrated in
   videos from Vimeo that are integrated on our site. We have no influence
   on the settings of tracking and the analysis results collected in this
   way and cannot see them. In addition, web beacons are set for website
   visitors by embedding Vimeo videos.

   In order to prevent the use of Google Analytics tracking cookies, you
   may refuse the use of cookies by selecting the appropriate settings on
   your browser, however please note that if you do this you may not be
   able to use the full functionality of this website. You can also
   prevent Google from collecting the data generated by the cookie and
   relating to your use of the website (including your IP address) and
   from processing this data by Google by downloading and installing the
   browser plug-in available under the following link:
   http://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout?hl=en

   As an alternative to the browser plugin, you can click this link to
   prevent Google Analytics from collecting data on this website in the
   future. An opt-out cookie is stored on your mobile device. If you
   delete your cookies, you must click the link again. The purpose and
   scope of the data collection and the further processing and use of the
   data by the providers as well as your relevant rights and setting
   options for the protection of your privacy can be found in Vimeo’s data
   protection information at https://vimeo.com/privacy
   [ ]

Our online presence on social media platforms

   Our presences on social networks and platforms serve a better, active
   communication with our customers and interested parties. We inform
   there about our products and current special offers.
   When you visit our websites in social media, your data may be
   automatically collected and stored for market research and advertising
   purposes. So-called usage profiles are created from these data using
   pseudonyms. These can be used, for example, to place advertisements
   inside and outside the platforms that presumably correspond to your
   interests. For this purpose, cookies are usually used on your terminal.
   The visitor behaviour and the interests of the users are stored in
   these cookies.

   This serves in accordance with Art. 6 para. 1 lit. f. GDPR to protect
   our legitimate interests, which outweigh our interests, in an optimised
   presentation of our offer and effective communication with customers
   and interested parties. If you are asked by the respective Social-Media
   platform operators for a consent (agreement) into the data processing,
   e.g. with the help of a checkbox, is the legal basis of the data
   processing art. 6 exp. 1 lit. a GDPR.

   If the aforementioned social media platforms are headquartered in the
   USA, the following applies: The European Commission has adopted a
   decision on appropriateness for the USA. This goes back to the EU-US
   Privacy Shield. A current certificate for the respective company can be
   viewed at https://www.privacyshield.gov/list
   For detailed information on the processing and use of the data by the
   providers on their pages as well as a contact option and your rights
   and setting options for the protection of your privacy, in particular
   opt-out options, please refer to the providers’ data protection
   information linked below. If you still need help, you can contact us.

   Facebook: https://www.facebook.com/about/privacy/
   Google/ YouTube: https://policies.google.com/privacy
   Twitter: https://twitter.com/de/privacy
   Instagram: http://instagram.com/about/legal/privacy/
   Pinterest: https://about.pinterest.com/de/privacy-policy
   LinkedIn: https://www.linkedin.com/legal/privacy-policy
   Xing: https://privacy.xing.com/de/datenschutzerklaerung
   Widerspruchsmöglichkeiten (Opt-Out):
   Facebook: https://www.facebook.com/settings?tab=ads
   Google/ YouTube: https://adssettings.google.com/authenticated
   Twitter: https://twitter.com/personalization
   Instagram: http://instagram.com/about/legal/privacy/
   Pinterest: https://www.pinterest.de/?next=/settings/
   LinkedIn:
   https://www.linkedin.com/psettings/guest-controls/retargeting-opt-out
   Xing:
   https://privacy.xing.com/de/datenschutzerklaerung/welche-rechte-koennen
   -sie-geltend-machen/widerspruchsrecht
   [ ]

Pixel of the VG WORT

   On some of our websites the pixel of VG WORT is integrated, via which
   we record the page accesses in order to report them to the
   Verwertungsgesellschaft Wort (VG Wort). This serves the purpose of
   enabling our authors to participate in the distributions of VG WORT and
   is based on our legal obligation to ensure the legal remuneration for
   the use of copyrighted works pursuant to Section 53 UrhG in accordance
   with art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. c GDPR.
   [ ]

Sending rating reminders by e-mail

   If you have given us your express consent to this during or after your
   order in accordance with art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. a GDPR, we will
   use your e-mail address to send you an evaluation reminder by e-mail.

   The consent can be revoked at any time by sending a message to the
   contact option described below with effect for the future.

   In other cases, requests for evaluation are sent as consideration for
   free membership and thus as an integral part of the membership
   contract. In these cases, data processing is necessary for the
   fulfilment of the contract and is therefore based on Art. 6 para. 1
   sentence 1 lit. b GDPR.
   [ ]

Contact possibilities and your rights

   As a data subject, you have the following rights:

   in accordance with art. 15 GDPR, you have the right to request
   information about your personal data processed by us to the extent
   described therein;

   in accordance with art. 16 GDPR, you have the right to demand the
   immediate correction of incorrect or complete personal data stored by
   us;

   in accordance with art. 17 GDPR, the right to request the deletion of
   your personal data stored with us, unless further processing
     * to exercise freedom of expression and information;
     * for the fulfilment of a legal obligation;
     * for reasons of public interest; or
     * for asserting, exercising or defending legal claims

   is required;

   in accordance with art. 18 GDPR, the right to request the restriction
   of the processing of your personal data, insofar as
     * the correctness of the data is denied by you;
     * the processing is unlawful, but you refuse to delete it;
     * we no longer need the data, but you do need it to assert, exercise
       or defend legal claims, or
     * you have lodged an objection to the processing pursuant to art. 21
       GDPR;

   In accordance with art. 20 GDPR, you have the right to receive your
   personal data that you have provided to us in a structured, current and
   machine-readable format or to request its transfer to another person
   responsible;

   the right to complain to a supervisory authority pursuant to art. 77
   GDPR. You can also contact the supervisory authority at your usual
   place of residence or workplace or at our company headquarters.

   If you have any questions regarding the collection, processing or use
   of your personal data, information, correction, restriction of the
   processing or deletion of data or revocation of any consent given or
   objection to a specific use of data, please contact our company data
   protection officer.

   Data Protection Officer
   Subbelrather Str. 15c
   50823 Cologne
   privacy@trustedshops.com
   [ ]

Right of objection

   Insofar as we process personal data as described above in order to
   protect our legitimate interests that are overriding in the process of
   balancing of interests, you can object to this processing with effect
   for the future. If the data is processed for direct marketing purposes,
   you can exercise this right at any time as described above. If the
   processing takes place for other purposes, you are only entitled to a
   right of objection if there are reasons arising from your particular
   situation.

   After exercising your right of objection, we will not process your
   personal data further for these purposes, unless we can prove
   compelling reasons worthy of protection for the processing, which
   outweigh your interests, rights and freedoms, or if the processing
   serves to assert, exercise or defend legal claims.

   This does not apply if the processing is for direct marketing purposes.
   Then we will not process your personal data for this purpose.

   For online shoppers
     * Trustmark
     * Buyer protection
     * Customer reviews
     * FAQ
     * Trustmark fraud
     * Contact

   Corporate
     * About us
     * Jobs
     * Press
     * Imprint & data privacy

   For retailers
     * Products & Pricing
     * Success stories
     * Support

   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-TPWN9Q
   #alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate
   alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate

   Trusted Shops - The safe way to web shopping Trusted Shops - The safe
   way to web shopping

     * Login
     * Features
     * Support
     * References
     * More

   Shop finder Login Register now

Customer reviews knowledge base

Self-service support

   The knowledge base articles and tutorials will help you to get up and
   running with Trusted Shops customer reviews. If you don’t find what you
   are looking for, simply give us a ring or drop us an email.

Getting Started

   Find everything you need to start getting better reviews.

Integrate Trustbadge^®

   Integrate your Trustbadge^® within minutes. Show your seller rating and
   stars to your customers and get a continuous stream of incoming
   reviews.

Collect Reviews

   Fully automated or web-based without integration, straight away or
   later - you can collect reviews in various ways.

Show Reviews

   Trustbadge^® Technology, Public Review Profile, Review Sticker and how
   to embed everything properly.

Manage Reviews

   Always be up-to-date, reply to comments and show you that you care for
   your customers.

Google Seller Rating

   How to create more visibility on Google, how to show your stars
   automatically.

Software integration

   Using Magento, Shopify, ePages or similar? Find simple how-to's and
   plug-ins.

Product reviews

   More visitors, higher conversion rates, fewer returns.

Traffic Package

   More visitors and customer loyalty. You are just a few clicks away from
   starting your own campaigns.

FAQ

   Everything you want to know from our support team. And your gateway to
   our great APIs.

   Trusted Shops Logo
   © 1999-2019 TRUSTED SHOPS GmbH. [flag_en-EU.png]

     * [flag_fr-BE.png] Belgique / België
     * [flag_en-DK.png] Danmark
     * [flag_de-DE.png] Deutschland
     * [flag_es-ES.png] España
     * [flag_fr-FR.png] France
     * [flag_it-IT.png] Italia
     * [flag_nl-NL.png] Nederland
     * [flag_de-AT.png] Österreich
     * [flag_pl-PL.png] Polska
     * [flag_de-CH.png] Schweiz
     * [flag_en-SE.png] Sverige
     * [flag_en-GB.png] United Kingdom
     * [flag_en-EU.png] Rest of Europe
     *

   All rights reserved. Contact, FAQ, Data privacy and Imprint

   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-TPWN9Q
   #alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate
   alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate

   Trusted Shops - The safe way to web shopping Trusted Shops - The safe
   way to web shopping

     * Login
     * Features
     * Support
     * References
     * More

   Shop finder Login

Data protection

   privacy

   Thank you for visiting our website http://www.trustedshops.eu.
   Protection of your privacy is very important to us.
   Below you will find extensive information about how we handle your
   data.

Privacy Statement

   Thank you for your interest in our website. The protection of your
   privacy is very important to us. Below we inform you in detail about
   the handling of your data.

1. Access data and hosting

   You can visit our website without providing any personal information.
   With every visit of the website, the web server automatically saves a
   so-called server log file which, for example, contains the name of the
   requested file, your IP address, date and time of the call, the amount
   of data transmitted and the requesting provider (access data) and
   documents the call.

   These access data are evaluated exclusively for the purpose of ensuring
   trouble-free operation of the site and improving our services. This
   serves according to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f GDPR the protection
   of our legitimate interests in the proper presentation of our offer
   that are overriding in the process of balancing of interests. All
   access data will be deleted no later than seven days after the end of
   your visit to the site.

   Third-party hosting services
   Within the framework of processing on our behalf, third party providers
   provide us with hosting and presentation services for our websites. We
   use the following service providers for hosting the respective website:
   URL
   Hosting Provider
   etrusted.com/en Raidboxes GmbH, Friedrich-Ebert-Straße 7, 41853
   Münster, DE

   trustedshops.co.uk
   ANEXIA Internetdienstleistungs GmbH, Feldkirchener Straße 140, 9020
   Klagenfurt am Wörtersee, Österreich
   business.trustedshops.co.uk HubSpot, Inc., 25 First Street, 2nd Floor,
   Cambridge, MA 02141, USA
   shop.trustedshops.com/en Timme Hosting GmbH & Co. KG, Ovelgönner Weg
   43, 21335 Lüneburg, DE

   If a service provider is based in the USA, it is certified under the
   EU-US Privacy Shield. A current certificate can be viewed here. As a
   result of this agreement between the US and the European Commission,
   the latter has established an adequate level of data protection for
   companies certified under the Privacy Shield. Further, we have agreed
   the application of EU standard data protection clauses with other
   service providers based in a country outside the EU or the EEA in order
   to provide suitable guarantees pursuant to art. 46 para. 2 lit. c GDPR.

   All data collected in the context of the use of these web pages or in
   forms provided for the purposes as described below are processed on the
   servers of the respective service provider. Processing on other servers
   only takes place as described within this privacy statement.

2. Data collection and use for the use of Trusted Shops products

   We collect personal data if you voluntarily provide it when contacting
   us (e.g. via contact form or e-mail). Mandatory fields are marked as
   such, since in these cases we require the data for processing your
   contact or opening of the customer account in accordance with art. 6
   para. 1 sentence 1 lit. b GDPR and you cannot send the contact without
   this information. Which data is collected can be seen from the
   respective input forms. We use the data provided by you to process your
   enquiries.

   We have engaged service providers for the technical processing of your
   inquiries on our behalf. These service providers are based in the USA
   and are certified under the EU-US Privacy Shield. As a result of this
   agreement between the US and the European Commission, the latter has
   established an adequate level of data protection for companies
   certified under the Privacy Shield.

   After complete processing of the inquiry, your data will be restricted
   for further processing and deleted after expiry of the storage periods
   under tax and commercial law, unless you have expressly consented to
   further use of your data or we reserve the right to use data beyond
   this, which is permitted by law and about which we inform you in this
   declaration.

Live Chat Tool Userlike

   If you use the live chat tool to make contact, the data you voluntarily
   enter there (name, e-mail address, message) will be stored on our
   behalf at our service provider Userlike on servers within Germany. They
   will be processed there for the purpose of answering the inquiry by us
   and subsequently deleted in accordance with art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1
   lit. b GDPR.

Registration for Trusted Shops buyer protection

   When subscribing for Trusted Shops buyer protection, we need your
   e-mail address, the total purchase price, the selected payment method,
   purchase order number, your customer number (if you have one) and the
   name of the online shop from which you ordered the product.

   Your data will be used within the scope of contract processing in
   accordance with art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. b GDPR for the purpose
   of providing the Trusted Shops buyer protection to you.

   Only in the event of a claim under the buyer protection we require
   additional information and personal data from you to review and process
   your claim for reimbursement. When registering a refund claim, your
   name, address, telephone number and bank account will be charged for
   the refund.

   With the buyer protection you also get access to the Trusted Shops
   customer login (My Trusted Shops). In the Trusted Shops customer login
   you can see your active and concluded buyer protection contracts,
   submit refund applications and submit or change ratings for your
   orders. Your e-mail address serves as identification and user name for
   access to My Trusted Shops. You have the possibility to personalize
   your membership account by voluntarily entering further personal data
   such as your name, place of residence and/or a profile picture in the
   Trusted Shops customer login or when submitting a rating.

   Your submitted ratings can then be displayed with these additional
   details, although some details to protect your privacy are always only
   displayed in abridged form. Similarly, a summary of all assessments
   submitted can then be publicly retrieved. Your email address will not
   be publicly displayed. You can change or remove your personal data at
   any time in My Trusted Shops. You can also deactivate the public
   display of your profile there.

   After complete processing of the contract or deactivation of your
   customer account, your data will be restricted for further processing
   and deleted after expiry of the storage periods under tax and
   commercial law, unless you have expressly consented to further use of
   your data or we reserve the right to use data beyond this, which is
   permitted by law and about which we inform you in this declaration. You
   can deactivate your customer account at any time and either by sending
   a message to the contact option described below or using the function
   provided for this purpose in the customer account.

Subscribing to rating reminder

   If, during or after placing your order, you grant an express consent
   according to art. 6 par. 1 sentence 1 lit. a GDPR to receiving email
   reminders, your email address will be transferred to Trusted Shops for
   the purpose of sending you email reminders about rating your purchase
   order using the Trusted Shops customer rating service. If you subscribe
   to the automated rating reminder service, you will be automatically
   receiving email reminders about rating a transaction after every
   purchase from the Trusted Shops members. On your every visit, you will
   be recognised based on anonymised data. You may withdraw your consent
   to receiving email reminders at any time, with effect on your future
   orders.

   If you submit an evaluation via the Trusted Shops evaluation system, we
   require your e-mail address within the framework of our user contract
   in accordance with art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. b GDPR in order to
   ensure the validity and trustworthiness of the evaluation. The e-mail
   address will be stored for this purpose together with the order number
   and the evaluation submitted. When you submit a product review, the URL
   of the product and the product image, the product name, the product
   SKU, GTIN and MPN, and the manufacturer are also saved.

   In order to make the rating system secure, to prevent incorrect or
   falsified ratings and to ensure proper operation of the rating system,
   we also collect your IP address when you submit a rating. This serves
   to safeguard our legitimate interests in the prevention of misuse and
   the protection of our systems that are overriding in the process of
   balancing of interests in accordance with art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1
   lit. f GDPR. The IP address is stored for a maximum of 7 days for the
   evaluation and then deleted.

Social login via Facebook or Google

   You can link your Trusted Shops buyers account to your Facebook or
   Google account.

   Facebook, Inc. and Google LLC are based in the USA. They are certified
   under the EU-US Privacy Shield. A current certificate can be
   viewed here. As a result of this agreement between the US and the
   European Commission, the latter has established an adequate level of
   data protection for companies certified under the Privacy Shield.

   In case of a link between the accounts, you will only need to
   authenticate to Facebook or Google using your login information to be
   logged into your Trusted Shops customer account for buyers. For this
   purpose, you will be asked to consent to the transmission of the
   following data to Trusted Shops the first time you create a link:

   Facebook: E-mail address, name, profile photo, age range (e.g. 35-39),
   language, country and other data that you have set to public on your
   Facebook profile.

   Google: E-mail address, name, profile photo and other data that you
   have posted on your Google profile as publicly available.

   The data Trusted Shops receives from Facebook or Google will be used to
   help you design your shopper profile on the basis of your consent
   pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. a GDPR. Facebook receives
   the e-mail address from Trusted Shops the first time it is linked in
   order to identify you as a user, and afterwards only the ID that has
   been set as an authentication feature for you between the two systems.
   Facebook or Google does not receive any further data. You can unlink
   the accounts at any time and revoke the transfer of data with future
   effect by changing your settings on Facebook (here) or Google (here).

Registration for Trusted Shops membership for online merchants

   An application for membership for online merchants is only offered to
   persons acting in the exercise of their commercial or self-employed
   professional activity. Personal data is collected for the purpose of
   contract processing in accordance with art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. b
   GDPR if you voluntarily provide it to us when contacting us or
   registering for our services.

   After complete processing of the contract, your data will be restricted
   for further processing and deleted after expiry of the storage periods
   under tax and commercial law, unless you have expressly consented to
   further use of your data or we reserve the right to use data beyond
   this, which is permitted by law and about which we inform you in this
   declaration.

Application for a job at Trusted Shops

   If you apply for a position at Trusted Shops via this website, personal
   data will be collected in our application portal for the purpose of
   handling the evaluation process in accordance with art. 6 para. 1
   sentence 1 lit. b GDPR.

   This portal is operated by a service provider who processes the data
   collected on its servers on our behalf .

   The data you provide in our application portal will be used exclusively
   for the purpose of filling the advertised position and checking and
   processing your application submitted in this context. After completion
   of the application process, this data will be blocked for further use
   and deleted upon expiry of any storage obligations, unless you
   expressly consent to any other processing.

3. Data transfer

   If you have ordered goods which we will send to you by post, we will
   pass on the data required for the fulfilment of the contract in
   accordance with art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. b GDPR to the shipping
   company commissioned with the delivery if this is necessary for the
   delivery of ordered goods. Depending on which payment service provider
   you select in the order process, we pass on the payment data collected
   for the processing of payments to the credit institution commissioned
   with the payment and, if applicable, to payment service providers
   commissioned by us or to the selected payment service. In some cases,
   the selected payment service providers also collect this data
   themselves if you create an account there. In this case, you must log
   in to the payment service provider with your access data during the
   ordering process. The data protection declaration of the respective
   payment service provider applies in this respect.

   We use a payment service provider based in a country outside the
   European Union. The transmission of personal data to this company only
   takes place within the scope of the necessity to fulfil the contract.

Credit check when registering for Trusted Shops membership for online
merchants

   Only if you act in the exercise of your commercial or self-employed
   professional activity, we transmit your address data to credit agencies
   when concluding a membership contract for online merchants for the
   purpose of assessing the liability risk and for credit assessment if
   necessary. This serves to settle the contractual relationship pursuant
   to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. b GDPR.

   We transfer the personal data required for a credit assessment to the
   following company(s):

   Verband der Vereine Creditreform e.V.
   Hellersbergstr. 12
   D-41460 Neuss, Germany

   Appropriate measures to protect your rights, freedoms and legitimate
   interests will be taken into account. You have the opportunity to make
   your views known and to challenge the decision by contacting the
   contact person described below.

4. E-mail newsletter and postal advertising

E-mail advertising with registration for the newsletter

   If you register for one of our newsletters or provide your data in
   order to download a document free of charge from our website or our
   Facebook or LinkedIn presence, we use the data required for this or
   separately provided by you in order to regularly send you our e-mail
   newsletter on the basis of your consent in accordance with art. 6 para.
   1 sentence 1 lit. a GDPR.

   The newsletter is sent on our behalf by service providers to whom we
   pass on your e-mail address for this purpose.

   If the newsletter is sent via a service provider based in the USA, it
   is certified under the EU-US Privacy Shield. As a result of this
   agreement between the US and the European Commission, the latter has
   established an adequate level of data protection for companies
   certified under the Privacy Shield.

   You can unsubscribe from the newsletter at any time and either by
   sending a message to the contact option described below or via a link
   provided for this purpose in the newsletter. After deregistration, we
   delete your e-mail address unless you have expressly consented to
   further use of your data or we reserve the right to use data beyond
   this, which is permitted by law and about which we inform you in this
   declaration.

E-mail advertising without registration for the newsletter and your right of
objection

   If we receive your e-mail address in connection with the sale of a
   product or service and you have not objected to this, we reserve the
   right to regularly send you offers for similar products, such as those
   already purchased, from our range by e-mail in accordance with Section
   7 (3) UWG. This serves to safeguard our legitimate interests in an
   advertising approach to our customers that are overriding in the
   process of balancing of interests in accordance with art. 6 para. 1
   sentence 1 lit. f GDPR.

   The newsletter is sent on our behalf by service providers to whom we
   pass on your e-mail address for this purpose.

   If the newsletter is sent via a service provider based in the USA, it
   is certified under the EU-US Privacy Shield. As a result of this
   agreement between the US and the European Commission, the latter has
   established an adequate level of data protection for companies
   certified under the Privacy Shield.

   You can object to this use of your e-mail address at any time by
   sending a message to the contact option described below or via a link
   provided for this purpose in the advertising e-mail.

Postal advertising and your right of objection

   Furthermore, we reserve the right to use your first and last name as
   well as your postal address for our own advertising purposes, e.g. to
   send interesting offers and information about our products by post.
   This serves to safeguard our legitimate interests in an advertising
   approach to our customers that are overriding in the process of
   balancing of interests in accordance with art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1
   lit. f GDPR.

   The advertising mailings are processed on our behalf by a service
   provider to whom we pass on your data.

   You can object to the storage and use of your data for these purposes
   at any time by sending a message to the contact option described below.

5. Integration of the Trusted Shops Trustbadge

   To display our ratings collected, the Trusted Shops Trustbadge is
   integrated on some of our websites.

   Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. f GDPR, this serves to
   safeguard our legitimate interests in the optimal marketing of our
   offer that are overriding in the process of balancing of interests. The
   Trustbadge and the services advertised with it are an offer of Trusted
   Shops GmbH, Subbelrather Str. 15C, 50823 Cologne.

   When the Trustbadge is called, the web server automatically saves a
   so-called server log file, which contains e.g. your IP address, date
   and time of the call, transferred data volume and the requesting
   provider (access data) and documents the call. This access data is not
   evaluated and is automatically overwritten at the latest seven days
   after the end of your page visit.

6. Cookies

   To improve the user experience on our website and enable you to use its
   certain features in order to show suitable products or conduct market
   research, some pages of this website use the so-called cookies. This
   serves the protection of our legitimate interests in the optimised
   presentation of our offer according to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f
   GDPR that are overriding in the process of balancing of interests. A
   cookie is a small text file which is stored automatically on your end
   device. Some of the cookies we use are deleted after you close the
   browser session, i.e. when you close the browser (that’s the so-called
   session cookies). Other cookies are stored in your end-user device and
   enable us to recognise your browser when you visit us again (persistent
   cookies). To check the cookie storage period, you can use the Overview
   function in the cookie settings of your web browser. You can configure
   your browser for it to inform you whenever a page uses cookies and
   decide on a case-by-case basis whether to accept or reject the cookies
   on a given website or generally. Every browser has a different policy
   for managing the cookie settings. The browser’s policy is described in
   the Help menu of every browser and explains how you can change your
   cookie settings. To find out how to change the settings in your
   browser, see the links below:

   Internet
   Explorer™: https://support.microsoft.com/en-gb/help/17442/windows-inter
   net-explorer-delete-manage-cookies
   Safari™: https://support.apple.com/kb/PH21411?locale=de_DE&viewlocale=e
   n_US
   Chrome™: https://support.google.com/chrome/answer/95647?hl=en&hlrm=en
   Firefox™: https://support.mozilla.org/en-US/kb/enable-and-disable-cooki
   es-website-preferences
   Opera™ : http://help.opera.com/Windows/10.20/en/cookies.html

   Please note that disabling cookies may limit your access to some
   features of our website.

a. Web analysis

Use of Google (Universal) Analytics for web analysis

   For website analysis, this website uses Google (Universal) Analytics, a
   web analysis service of Google LLC (www.google.de). Pursuant to art. 6
   para. 1 sentence 1 lit f GDPR, this serves to safeguard our legitimate
   interests in an optimised presentation of our offer that are overriding
   in the process of balancing of interests. Google (Universal) Analytics
   uses methods that enable an analysis of your use of the website, such
   as cookies. The automatically collected information about your use of
   this website is usually transferred to a Google server in the USA and
   stored there. By activating IP anonymisation on this website, the IP
   address is shortened prior to transmission within the Member States of
   the European Union or in other states party to the Agreement on the
   European Economic Area. Only in exceptional cases will the full IP
   address be transmitted to a Google server in the USA and shortened
   there. The anonymous IP address transmitted by your browser within the
   framework of Google Analytics is not merged with other Google data.
   After the end of the use of Google Analytics by us the data collected
   in this context will be deleted.

   Google LLC is headquartered in the USA and is certified under the EU-US
   Privacy Shield. A current certificate can be viewed here. As a result
   of this agreement between the US and the European Commission, the
   latter has established an adequate level of data protection for
   companies certified under the Privacy Shield.

   You can prevent Google from collecting the data generated by the cookie
   and relating to your use of the website (including your IP address) and
   from processing this data by Google by downloading and installing the
   browser plug-in available under the following
   link: http://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout?hl=en. As an alternative
   to the browser plugin, you can click this link to prevent Google
   Analytics from collecting data on this website in the future. An
   opt-out cookie is stored on your mobile device. If you delete your
   cookies, you must click the link again.

Use of Hubspot for web analysis

   For website analysis purposes, Hubspot, Inc. (www.hubspot.com)
   Automatically collects and stores data from which user profiles are
   created using pseudonyms. Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f
   GDPR, this serves to safeguard our legitimate interests in an optimised
   presentation of our offer that are overriding in the process of
   balancing of interests. Cookies may be used for this purpose. After the
   end of the use of Hubspot by us, the data collected in this context
   will be deleted.

   Hubspot, Inc. is headquartered in the USA and is certified under the
   EU-US Privacy Shield. A current certificate can be viewed here. As a
   result of this agreement between the US and the European Commission,
   the latter has established an adequate level of data protection for
   companies certified under the Privacy Shield.

   You can object to the collection and storage of data at any time with
   future effect by clicking this link. After your objection, an opt-out
   cookie is stored on your mobile device. If you delete your cookies, you
   must click the link again.

Use of Hotjar for web analysis

   For website analysis purposes, data is automatically collected and
   stored on this website using technologies of Hojar Limited
   (www.hotjar.com), from which user profiles are created using
   pseudonyms. Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f GDPR, this
   serves to safeguard our legitimate interests in an optimised
   presentation of our offer that are overriding in the process of
   balancing of interests. Cookies may be used for this purpose. The
   pseudonymised user profiles are not combined with personal data about
   the bearer of the pseudonym without express consent to be given
   separately. After the end of the use of Hotjar by us the data collected
   in this context will be deleted. You can object to the collection and
   storage of data at any time with future effect by clicking this link.

   After your objection, an opt-out cookie is stored on your mobile
   device. If you delete your cookies, you must click the link again.

Use of Optimizely for web analysis and A/B tests

   For website analysis and A/B tests, data is automatically collected and
   stored on this website with technologies of Optimizely GmbH
   (www.optimizely.com), from which user profiles are created using
   pseudonyms. Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f GDPR, this
   serves to safeguard our legitimate interests in an optimised
   presentation of our offer that are overriding in the process of
   balancing of interests. Cookies may be used for this purpose. The
   pseudonymised user profiles are not combined with personal data about
   the bearer of the pseudonym without express consent to be given
   separately. After the end of our use of Optimizely the data collected
   in this context will be deleted. You can object to the collection and
   storage of data at any time with future effect by clicking this link.

   After your objection, an opt-out cookie is stored on your mobile
   device. If you delete your cookies, you must click the link again.

Use of Tealium

   This website uses technologies from Tealium, Inc. (www.tealium.com)
   Automatically collected and stored data from which user profiles are
   created using pseudonyms. Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f
   GDPR, this serves to safeguard our legitimate interests in an optimised
   presentation of our offer that are overriding in the process of
   balancing of interests. Cookies may be used for this purpose. The data
   collected in this context will be deleted once we have ceased using
   Tealium for its intended purpose and at the end of its use.

   Tealium, Inc. is headquartered in the USA and is certified under the
   EU-US Privacy Shield. A current certificate can be viewed here. As a
   result of this agreement between the US and the European Commission,
   the latter has established an adequate level of data protection for
   companies certified under the Privacy Shield.

   You can object to the collection and storage of data at any time with
   future effect by clicking this link. After your objection, an opt-out
   cookie is stored on your mobile device. If you delete your cookies, you
   must click the link again.

b. Advertising via marketing networks

Google Tag Manager

   We use the Google Tag Manager to manage usage-based advertising
   services. The Tag Manager itself is a cookie-free domain and does not
   collect any personal data. Rather, the tool triggers other tags that
   may in turn collect data (see above). If you have disabled at the
   domain or cookie level, it will remain for all tracking tags
   implemented with Google Tag Manager.

Google Double Click

   This website uses the so-called DoubleClick cookie as part of the
   Google Analytics application, which enables your browser to be
   recognised when you visit other websites. Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1
   sentence 1 lit f GDPR, this serves to safeguard our legitimate
   interests in an optimal marketing of our website that are overriding in
   the process of balancing of interests. The information automatically
   generated by the cookie about your visit to this website is transferred
   to a Google server in the USA and stored there. The IP address will be
   reduced by activating IP anonymisation on this website prior to
   transmission within the Member States of the European Union or in other
   states party to the Agreement on the European Economic Area. Only in
   exceptional cases will the full IP address be transmitted to a Google
   server in the USA and shortened there. The anonymous IP address
   transmitted by your browser as part of Google Analytics will not be
   merged with other Google data. After the end of the use of the Google
   services by us the data collected in this context will be deleted.

   Google Double Click is a service of Google LLC. (www.google.de). Google
   LLC is headquartered in the USA and is certified under the EU-US
   Privacy Shield. A current certificate can be viewed here. As a result
   of this agreement between the US and the European Commission, the
   latter has established an adequate level of data protection for
   companies certified under the Privacy Shield.

   You can disable the DoubleClick cookie using this link. You can also
   contact the Digital Advertising Alliance to find out how to set cookies
   and to make the relevant settings. Finally, you can set your browser so
   that you are informed about the setting of cookies and decide
   individually whether to accept them or to exclude the acceptance of
   cookies for certain cases or in general. If cookies are not accepted,
   the functionality of our website may be limited.

Google AdSense

   Our site uses Google AdSense to market space for third-party ads and
   advertising networks. These ads are displayed in various places on this
   website. As part of the integration of Google AdSense, the so-called
   DoubleClick cookie is set by Google for all page visitors. This enables
   the display of interest-compatible advertising by automatically
   assigning a pseudonymous UserID, with the help of which the interests
   are determined on the basis of visits to this and other websites.
   Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f GDPR, this serves to
   safeguard our legitimate interests in an optimal marketing of our
   website that are overriding in the process of balancing of
   interests. After the end of the use of the Google services by us the
   data collected in this context will be deleted.

   Google AdSense is a service of Google LLC (www.google.de). Google LLC
   is headquartered in the USA and is certified under the EU-US Privacy
   Shield. A current certificate can be viewed here. As a result of this
   agreement between the US and the European Commission, the latter has
   established an adequate level of data protection for companies
   certified under the Privacy Shield.

   You can disable the cookie using this link. You can also contact
   the Digital Advertising Alliance to find out how to set cookies and to
   make the relevant settings.

Google AdWords Remarketing and Google Analytics Audiences

   We use Google Adwords Remarketing and Google Analytics Audiences to
   advertise this website in Google search results and on third-party
   websites. When you visit our website, Google sets the so-called
   remarketing cookie or additionally uses the Google Analytics cookie. In
   this case, both cookies automatically enable interest-based advertising
   by means of a pseudonymous CookieID and on the basis of the pages you
   have visited. After our use of Google AdWords Remarketing and Google
   Analytics has ceased and has ended, the data collected in this context
   will be deleted. Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f GDPR, the
   use of these tools serves to safeguard our legitimate interests in an
   optimal marketing of our website that are overriding in the process of
   balancing of interests. After the end of the use of the Google services
   by us the data collected in this context will be deleted.

   Any additional processing will only take place if you have agreed with
   Google that your web and app browsing history will be linked to your
   Google Account and information from your Google Account will be used to
   personalise ads you see on the web. If you are logged in to Google
   while visiting our website, Google will use your data together with
   Google Analytics data to create and define target group lists for
   cross-device remarketing. To this end, Google temporarily links your
   personal data with Google Analytics data to form target groups.

   Google AdWords Remarketing and Google Analytics are services of Google
   LLC (www.google.com). Google LLC is headquartered in the USA and is
   certified under the EU-US Privacy Shield. A current certificate can be
   viewed here. As a result of this agreement between the US and the
   European Commission, the latter has established an adequate level of
   data protection for companies certified under the Privacy Shield.

   You can disable the remarketing cookie via this link. You can also
   click this link to prevent future collection by Google Analytics on
   this website. An opt-out cookie is stored on your mobile device. If you
   delete your cookies, you must click the link again.

   You can also contact the Digital Advertising Alliance to find out how
   to set cookies and to make the relevant settings.

AdRoll Retargeting

   Through our advertising partner AdRoll Advertising Limited, Level 6, 1,
   Burlington Plaza, Burlington Road, Dublin 4, Ireland, we advertise this
   website in search results and on third-party websites. When you visit
   our website, a cookie from these providers or their partners is
   automatically set, which enables interest-based advertising by means of
   a pseudonymous cookie ID and on the basis of the pages you visit.
   Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f GDPR, this serves to
   safeguard our legitimate interests in an optimal marketing of our
   website that are overriding in the process of balancing of
   interests. After the end of our use of AdRoll Retargeting, the data
   collected in this context will be deleted.

   You can disable the retargeting cookie by clicking on one of the
   following links: https://app.adroll.com/optout/safari.

   Alternatively, you can disable the use of cookies by third parties by
   visiting the opt-out page of the Digital Advertising Alliance.

LinkedIn Insight & Conversion Tag

   Through our advertising partner LinkedIn Corporation, we advertise this
   website on the LinkedIn platform (www.linkedin.com). When you visit our
   website, a cookie from this provider is automatically set, which
   enables interest-based advertising by means of a pseudonymous cookie ID
   and based on the pages you have visited. Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1
   sentence 1 lit f GDPR, this serves to safeguard our legitimate
   interests in an optimal marketing of our website that are overriding in
   the process of balancing of interests. After the end of our use of the
   LinkedIn Insight & Conversion Tag, the data collected in this context
   will be deleted.

   You can disable the remarketing cookie via this link. You can also
   contact the Digital Advertising Alliance to find out how to set cookies
   and to make the relevant settings.

Twitter Ads & Conversion

   Through our advertising partner Twitter, Inc., we advertise this
   website on the Twitter platform (www.twitter.com). When you visit our
   website, a cookie from this provider is automatically set, which
   enables interest-based advertising by means of a pseudonymous cookie ID
   and based on the pages you have visited. Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1
   sentence 1 lit f GDPR, this serves to safeguard our legitimate
   interests in an optimal marketing of our website that are overriding in
   the process of balancing of interests. After the end of our use of
   Twitter the data collected in this context will be deleted.

   You can disable the remarketing cookie via this link. You can also
   contact the Digital Advertising Alliance to find out how to set cookies
   and to make the relevant settings.

Advertising via the pixel of the social network Facebook

   On this website the Facebook pixel is integrated. We use the following
   functions of the Facebook Pixel for the specified purposes:
     * Facebook Connect, analysis of access data for the purposes of
       interest-based advertising on Facebook;
     * Facebook Custom Audience, analysis of access data for purposes of
       targeted advertising to third parties on Facebook;
     * Facebook Events, analysis of access data for the purpose of
       advertising upcoming events;
     * Facebook Pixel Remarketing, analysis of the access data of product
       pages for the purpose of displaying interest-based advertising on
       Facebook;
     * Facebook Pixel Tracking, analysis of access data for the purpose of
       interest-based advertising on Facebook;
     * Facebook Pixel Conversions, analysis of the conversion data at
       order completion (order value, currency, indication of whether
       existing or new customer) for purposes of interest-based
       advertising on Facebook and the billing of these.

   The Facebook pixel automatically sets a cookie when you visit our
   website, which automatically uses a pseudonymous cookie ID and the
   pages you visit to enable the above functions for the purposes
   explained. Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f GDPR, this
   serves to safeguard our legitimate interests in an optimal marketing of
   our website that are overriding in the process of balancing of
   interests. The data collected in this context will be deleted once the
   Facebook services have ceased to be used for their intended purpose and
   at the end of their use.

   The Facebook Pixel is a service of Facebook, Inc. (www.facebook.com).
   Facebook, Inc. is headquartered in the USA and is certified under the
   EU-US Privacy Shield. A current certificate can be viewed here. As a
   result of this agreement between the US and the European Commission,
   the latter has established an adequate level of data protection for
   companies certified under the Privacy Shield.

   The contradiction and a complete deactivation of the Facebook pixel is
   possible via the following link. Clicking on the opt-out link sets an
   opt-out cookie (persistent HTML5 storage object) with an unlimited
   validity period, which prevents any traffic through the Facebook pixel.
   This only applies to the browser currently in use on the mobile device
   and must be repeated for any other browser if necessary: Disable web
   tracking.

   You can also object to this processing of your data by contacting
   the Digital Advertising Alliance to find out about the setting of
   cookies and to make the relevant settings. After your objection, an
   opt-out cookie may be stored on your terminal. If you delete your
   cookies, you must click the links explained here again.

7. Social Media PlugIns

Use of the social plugins from Facebook, Google, Twitter, Instagram,
Pinterest using the Shariff solution

   On our website social buttons are used by social networks.

   In order to increase the protection of your data when you visit our
   website, these buttons are not fully integrated into the page as
   plug-ins, but only by using an HTML link. This integration ensures that
   no connection to the servers of the provider of the respective social
   network is established when a page of our website containing such
   buttons is called up.

   Click on one of the buttons, a new window of your browser opens and
   calls up the page of the respective service provider, on which you can
   (if necessary after entering your login data) e.g. press the Like or
   Share button. The purpose and scope of the data collection and the
   further processing and use of the data by the providers on their pages
   as well as the possibility of contact and your relevant rights and
   setting options for the protection of your privacy can be found in the
   data protection information of the providers.

   http://www.facebook.com/policy.php
   https://twitter.com/privacy
   http://www.google.com/intl/en/+/policy/+1button.html
   https://help.instagram.com/155833707900388
   https://policy.pinterest.com/en/privacy-policy


Youtube Video Plugins

   This website integrates content via the video platform service
   Youtube. Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f GDPR, this serves
   to safeguard our legitimate interests in an optimal presentation of our
   offer that are overriding in the process of balancing of interests.

   Youtube is operated by Google LLC (www.google.com). Google LLC is
   headquartered in the USA and is certified under the EU-US Privacy
   Shield. A current certificate can be viewed here. As a result of this
   agreement between the US and the European Commission, the latter has
   established an adequate level of data protection for companies
   certified under the Privacy Shield.

   For videos from Youtube, which are integrated on our site, the extended
   data protection setting is activated. This means that no information
   from website visitors is collected and stored on YouTube unless they
   play the video. The purpose and scope of the data collection and the
   further processing and use of the data by the providers as well as your
   relevant rights and setting options for the protection of your privacy
   can be found in the data protection information of
   Google http://www.google.com/intl/en/+/policy/+1button.html.".

Vimeo Video Plugins

   This website integrates content via the video platform service Vimeo.

   Vimeo is operated by Vimeo LLC, 555 West 18th Street, New York 10011,
   USA ("Vimeo"). Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f GDPR, this
   serves to safeguard our legitimate interests in an optimal presentation
   of our offer that are overriding in the process of balancing of
   interests.

   The tracking tool Google Analytics is automatically integrated in
   videos from Vimeo that are integrated on our site. We have no influence
   on the settings of tracking and the analysis results collected in this
   way and cannot see them. In addition, web beacons are set for website
   visitors by embedding Vimeo videos.

   In order to prevent the use of Google Analytics tracking cookies, you
   may refuse the use of cookies by selecting the appropriate settings on
   your browser, however please note that if you do this you may not be
   able to use the full functionality of this website. You can also
   prevent Google from collecting the data generated by the cookie and
   relating to your use of the website (including your IP address) and
   from processing this data by Google by downloading and installing the
   browser plug-in available under the following
   link: http://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout?hl=en

   As an alternative to the browser plugin, you can click this link to
   prevent Google Analytics from collecting data on this website in the
   future. An opt-out cookie is stored on your mobile device. If you
   delete your cookies, you must click the link again. The purpose and
   scope of the data collection and the further processing and use of the
   data by the providers as well as your relevant rights and setting
   options for the protection of your privacy can be found in Vimeo's data
   protection information at https://vimeo.com/privacy

8. Pixel of the VG WORT

   On some of our websites the pixel of VG WORT is integrated, via which
   we record the page accesses in order to report them to the
   Verwertungsgesellschaft Wort (VG Wort). This serves the purpose of
   enabling our authors to participate in the distributions of VG WORT and
   is based on our legal obligation to ensure the legal remuneration for
   the use of copyrighted works pursuant to Section 53 UrhG in accordance
   with art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. c GDPR.

9. Sending rating reminders by e-mail

   If you have given us your express consent to this during or after your
   order in accordance with art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. a GDPR, we will
   use your e-mail address to send you an evaluation reminder by e-mail.

   The consent can be revoked at any time by sending a message to the
   contact option described below with effect for the future.

10. Contact possibilities and your rights

   As a data subject, you have the following rights:

   in accordance with art. 15 GDPR, you have the right to request
   information about your personal data processed by us to the extent
   described therein;

   in accordance with art. 16 GDPR, you have the right to demand the
   immediate correction of incorrect or complete personal data stored by
   us;

   in accordance with art. 17 GDPR, the right to request the deletion of
   your personal data stored with us, unless further processing
     * to exercise freedom of expression and information;
     * for the fulfilment of a legal obligation;
     * for reasons of public interest; or
     * for asserting, exercising or defending legal claims

   is required;

   in accordance with art. 18 GDPR, the right to request the restriction
   of the processing of your personal data, insofar as
     * the correctness of the data is denied by you;
     * the processing is unlawful, but you refuse to delete it;
     * we no longer need the data, but you do need it to assert, exercise
       or defend legal claims, or
     * you have lodged an objection to the processing pursuant to art. 21
       GDPR;

   In accordance with art. 20 GDPR, you have the right to receive your
   personal data that you have provided to us in a structured, current and
   machine-readable format or to request its transfer to another person
   responsible;

   the right to complain to a supervisory authority pursuant to art. 77
   GDPR. You can also contact the supervisory authority at your usual
   place of residence or workplace or at our company headquarters.

   If you have any questions regarding the collection, processing or use
   of your personal data, information, correction, restriction of the
   processing or deletion of data or revocation of any consent given or
   objection to a specific use of data, please contact our company data
   protection officer.

   Data Protection Officer
   Subbelrather Str. 15c
   50823 Cologne
   privacy@trustedshops.com

   Right of objection

   Insofar as we process personal data as described above in order to
   protect our legitimate interests that are overriding in the process of
   balancing of interests, you can object to this processing with effect
   for the future. If the data is processed for direct marketing purposes,
   you can exercise this right at any time as described above. If the
   processing takes place for other purposes, you are only entitled to a
   right of objection if there are reasons arising from your particular
   situation.

   After exercising your right of objection, we will not process your
   personal data further for these purposes, unless we can prove
   compelling reasons worthy of protection for the processing, which
   outweigh your interests, rights and freedoms, or if the processing
   serves to assert, exercise or defend legal claims.

   This does not apply if the processing is for direct marketing purposes.
   Then we will not process your personal data for this purpose.

Imprint

   Person responsible under § 5 of Germany’s Telemedia Act (TMG) for
   www.trustedshops.eu is:

Registered office

   Trusted Shops GmbH
   Subbelrather Straße 15c
   50823 Cologne, Germany

   Tel.: +49 221 77536 371

   E-Mail: service@trustedshops.eu

   Cologne Local Court, Germany, Commercial Register (HRB) 32735

   VAT ID No.: DE 812 947 877

   Managing Directors: Jean-Marc Noël, Thomas Karst, Ulrich Hafenbradl

   Responsible for content: Ulrich Hafenbradl (responsible), Dr. Carsten
   Föhlisch

   Representative for minor protection, pursuant to Article 7 JMStV:
   Stefan Bodewig, jugendschutz@trustedshops.de
   Online dispute resolution according to Art. 14 (1) Regulation on
   consumer ODR: The European Commission provides a platform for online
   dispute resolutions (ODR) which can be accessed under
   http://ec.europa.eu/consumers/odr/. Consumers have the possibility to
   use this platform for resolving their disputes. We are ready to
   participate in extra-judicial dispute settlement proceedings before a
   consumer dispute resolution body.

   Trusted Shops Logo
   © 1999-2019 TRUSTED SHOPS GmbH. [flag_en-EU.png]

     * [flag_fr-BE.png] Belgique / België
     * [flag_en-DK.png] Danmark
     * [flag_de-DE.png] Deutschland
     * [flag_es-ES.png] España
     * [flag_fr-FR.png] France
     * [flag_it-IT.png] Italia
     * [flag_nl-NL.png] Nederland
     * [flag_de-AT.png] Österreich
     * [flag_pl-PL.png] Polska
     * [flag_de-CH.png] Schweiz
     * [flag_en-SE.png] Sverige
     * [flag_en-GB.png] United Kingdom
     * [flag_en-EU.png] Rest of Europe
     *

   All rights reserved. Contact, FAQ, Data privacy and Imprint

   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-TPWN9Q
   #alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate

     * Shops
     * Trustmark
     * Buyer protection
     * Customer reviews
     * Contact us
     * For retailers

     * Shopper-Login
     * For retailers

Imprint

   Person responsible under § 5 of Germany’s Telemedia Act (TMG)
   for http://www.trustedshops.eu.

   Trusted Shops GmbH
   Colonius Carré
   Subbelrather Straße 15c
   50823 Cologne, Germany

   Tel.: +49 (0)221 – 77 53 66
   Fax: +49 (0)221 – 77 53 6 89
   E-mail: info@trustedshops.com

   Cologne Local Court, Germany,
   Commercial Register (HRB) 32735
   VAT ID No.: DE 812 947 877

   Managing Directors:
   Jean-Marc Noël, Thomas Karst, Ulrich Hafenbradl
   Responsible for content:
   Ulrich Hafenbradl (responsible), Dr. Carsten Föhlisch

   Representative for minor protection, pursuant to Article 7 JMStV:
   Stefan Bodewig, jugendschutz@trustedshops.de

   Trusted Shops GmbH is registered in the Brokers’ Register under
   Register Number [D-B6MZ-QKA67-38]  as a licensed insurance agent
   pursuant to section 34d subsection 1 GewO (German Industrial Code)
   (www.vermittlerregister.info). The competent licensing and supervisory
   authority is the Cologne Chamber of Industry and Commerce, Unter
   Sachsenhausen 10-26, 50667 Cologne (https://ihk-koeln.de/). Trusted
   Shops GmbH is a member the Cologne Chamber of Industry and Commerce.

   Professional regulations governing insurance brokerage:
   – section 34d Gewerbeordnung (GewO): German Industrial Code
   – sections 59 – 68 Versicherungsvertragsgesetz (VVG): German Insurance
   Contract Act
   – Versicherungsvermittlungsverordnung (VersVermV): German Insurance
   Brokerage Ordinance

   The professional regulations can be viewed and downloaded from
   www.gesetze-im-internet.de, the homepage operated by the German Federal
   Ministry of Justice together with juris GmbH.

   Information on resolving disputes

   Information on online dispute resolution pursuant to Article 14 para. 1
   ODR Regulation: The European Commission provides a platform for online
   dispute resolutions (ODR) which can be accessed
   under http://ec.europa.eu/consumers/odr/. Consumers have the
   possibility to use this platform for resolving their disputes. We are
   ready to participate in extra-judicial dispute settlement proceedings
   before a consumer dispute resolution body.

   Information on the resolution of disputes pursuant to section 214 VVG
   in conjunction with the VVG Regulation governing Conciliation Bodies

   As insurance brokers, Trusted Shops GmbH are obliged by section 214 of
   the German Insurance Contract Act (VVG) in conjunction with the VVG
   Regulation governing Conciliation Bodies to participate in dispute
   resolution procedures. The competent body is as follows:

   Versicherungsombudsmann e.V.,
   Postfach 080632, 10006 Berlin (Germany)
   https://www.versicherungsombudsmann.de/


User Privacy Notice

   Thank you for your interest in our website. The protection of your
   privacy is very important to us. Below we inform you in detail about
   the handling of your data.

   [ ]

Access data and hosting

   You can visit our website without providing any personal information.
   With every visit of the website, the web server automatically saves a
   so-called server log file which, for example, contains the name of the
   requested file, your IP address, date and time of the call, the amount
   of data transmitted and the requesting provider (access data) and
   documents the call. For the purpose of a shorter loading time we also
   use a Content Delivery Network (“CDN”) for delivering our web assets
   via web servers of that CDN provider, who is working for us by means of
   an order processing agreement. Access data is also collected
   accordingly on the provider’s web servers.

   These access data are evaluated exclusively for the purpose of ensuring
   trouble-free operation of the site and improving our services. This
   serves according to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f GDPR the protection
   of our legitimate interests in the proper presentation of our offer
   that are overriding in the process of balancing of interests. All
   access data will be deleted no later than seven days after the end of
   your visit to the site.

   Third-party hosting services
   Within the framework of processing on our behalf, third party providers
   provide us with hosting and presentation services for our websites. We
   use the following service providers for hosting the respective website:

   etrusted.com/en: Raidboxes GmbH, Friedrich-Ebert-Straße 7, 41853
   Münster, DE

   trustedshops.co.uk: ANEXIA Internetdienstleistungs GmbH, Feldkirchener
   Straße 140, 9020 Klagenfurt am Wörtersee, Österreich

   business.trustedshops.co.uk: HubSpot, Inc., 25 First Street, 2nd Floor,
   Cambridge, MA 02141, USA

   shop.trustedshops.com/en: Timme Hosting GmbH & Co. KG, Ovelgönner Weg
   43, 21335 Lüneburg, DE

   If a service provider is based in the USA, it is certified under the
   EU-US Privacy Shield. A current certificate can be viewed here. As a
   result of this agreement between the US and the European Commission,
   the latter has established an adequate level of data protection for
   companies certified under the Privacy Shield. Further, we have agreed
   the application of EU standard data protection clauses with other
   service providers based in a country outside the EU or the EEA in order
   to provide suitable guarantees pursuant to art. 46 para. 2 lit. c GDPR.

   All data collected in the context of the use of these web pages or in
   forms provided for the purposes as described below are processed on the
   servers of the respective service provider. Processing on other servers
   only takes place as described within this privacy statement.
   [ ]

Data collection and use for the use of Trusted Shops products

   We collect personal data if you voluntarily provide it when contacting
   us (e.g. via contact form or e-mail). Mandatory fields are marked as
   such, since in these cases we require the data for processing your
   contact or opening of the customer account in accordance with art. 6
   para. 1 sentence 1 lit. b GDPR and you cannot send the contact without
   this information. Which data is collected can be seen from the
   respective input forms. We use the data provided by you to process your
   enquiries.

   We have engaged service providers for the technical processing of your
   inquiries on our behalf. These service providers are based in the USA
   and are certified under the EU-US Privacy Shield. As a result of this
   agreement between the US and the European Commission, the latter has
   established an adequate level of data protection for companies
   certified under the Privacy Shield.

   After complete processing of the inquiry, your data will be restricted
   for further processing and deleted after expiry of the storage periods
   under tax and commercial law, unless you have expressly consented to
   further use of your data or we reserve the right to use data beyond
   this, which is permitted by law and about which we inform you in this
   declaration.

   Live Chat Tool Userlike
   If you use the live chat tool to make contact, the data you voluntarily
   enter there (name, e-mail address, message) will be stored on our
   behalf at our service provider Userlike on servers within Germany. They
   will be processed there for the purpose of answering the inquiry by us
   and subsequently deleted in accordance with art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1
   lit. b GDPR.

   Registration for Trusted Shops buyer protection
   When subscribing for Trusted Shops buyer protection, we need your
   e-mail address, the total purchase price, the selected payment method,
   purchase order number, your customer number (if you have one) and the
   name of the online shop from which you ordered the product.

   Your data will be used within the scope of contract processing in
   accordance with art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. b GDPR for the purpose
   of providing the Trusted Shops buyer protection to you.

   Only in the event of a claim under the buyer protection we require
   additional information and personal data from you to review and process
   your claim for reimbursement. When registering a refund claim, your
   name, address, telephone number and bank account will be charged for
   the refund.

   With the buyer protection you also get access to the Trusted Shops
   customer login (My Trusted Shops). In the Trusted Shops customer login
   you can see your active and concluded buyer protection contracts,
   submit refund applications and submit or change ratings for your
   orders. Your e-mail address serves as identification and user name for
   access to My Trusted Shops. You have the possibility to personalize
   your membership account by voluntarily entering further personal data
   such as your name, place of residence and/or a profile picture in the
   Trusted Shops customer login or when submitting a rating.

   Your submitted ratings can then be displayed with these additional
   details, although some details to protect your privacy are always only
   displayed in abridged form. Similarly, a summary of all assessments
   submitted can then be publicly retrieved. Your email address will not
   be publicly displayed. You can change or remove your personal data at
   any time in My Trusted Shops. You can also deactivate the public
   display of your profile there.

   After complete processing of the contract or deactivation of your
   customer account, your data will be restricted for further processing
   and deleted after expiry of the storage periods under tax and
   commercial law, unless you have expressly consented to further use of
   your data or we reserve the right to use data beyond this, which is
   permitted by law and about which we inform you in this declaration. You
   can deactivate your customer account at any time and either by sending
   a message to the contact option described below or using the function
   provided for this purpose in the customer account.

   Submitting a rating
   If you submit a rating via the Trusted Shops evaluation system, we and
   the evaluated company require your e-mail address within the framework
   of our user contract in accordance with art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit.
   b GDPR in order to ensure the validity and trustworthiness of the
   evaluation and to contact you in case of well-founded complaints and
   for verification of your submited rating. The e-mail address together
   with the order number and the evaluation submitted will be stored and
   submitted to the evaluated company for these purposes.

   When you submit a product review, the URL of the product and the
   product image, the product name, the product SKU, GTIN and MPN, and the
   manufacturer are also saved.

   In order to make the rating system secure, to prevent incorrect or
   falsified ratings and to ensure proper operation of the rating system,
   we also collect your IP address when you submit a rating. This serves
   to safeguard our legitimate interests in the prevention of misuse and
   the protection of our systems that are overriding in the process of
   balancing of interests in accordance with art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1
   lit. f GDPR. The IP address is stored for a maximum of 7 days for the
   evaluation and then deleted.

   Social login via Facebook or Google
   You can link your Trusted Shops buyers account to your Facebook or
   Google account.

   Facebook, Inc. and Google LLC are based in the USA. They are certified
   under the EU-US Privacy Shield. A current certificate can be
   viewed here. As a result of this agreement between the US and the
   European Commission, the latter has established an adequate level of
   data protection for companies certified under the Privacy Shield.

   In case of a link between the accounts, you will only need to
   authenticate to Facebook or Google using your login information to be
   logged into your Trusted Shops customer account for buyers. For this
   purpose, you will be asked to consent to the transmission of the
   following data to Trusted Shops the first time you create a link:

   Facebook: E-mail address, name, profile photo, age range (e.g. 35-39),
   language, country and other data that you have set to public on your
   Facebook profile.

   Google: E-mail address, name, profile photo and other data that you
   have posted on your Google profile as publicly available.

   The data Trusted Shops receives from Facebook or Google will be used to
   help you design your shopper profile on the basis of your consent
   pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. a GDPR. Facebook receives
   the e-mail address from Trusted Shops the first time it is linked in
   order to identify you as a user, and afterwards only the ID that has
   been set as an authentication feature for you between the two systems.
   Facebook or Google does not receive any further data. You can unlink
   the accounts at any time and revoke the transfer of data with future
   effect by changing your settings on Facebook (here) or Google (here).

   Registration for Trusted Shops membership for online merchants
   An application for membership for online merchants is only offered to
   persons acting in the exercise of their commercial or self-employed
   professional activity. Personal data is collected for the purpose of
   contract processing in accordance with art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. b
   GDPR if you voluntarily provide it to us when contacting us or
   registering for our services.

   After complete processing of the contract, your data will be restricted
   for further processing and deleted after expiry of the storage periods
   under tax and commercial law, unless you have expressly consented to
   further use of your data or we reserve the right to use data beyond
   this, which is permitted by law and about which we inform you in this
   declaration.

   Application for a job at Trusted Shops
   If you apply for a position at Trusted Shops via this website, personal
   data will be collected in our application portal for the purpose of
   handling the evaluation process in accordance with art. 6 para. 1
   sentence 1 lit. b GDPR.

   This portal is operated by a service provider who processes the data
   collected on its servers on our behalf .

   The data you provide in our application portal will be used exclusively
   for the purpose of filling the advertised position and checking and
   processing your application submitted in this context. After completion
   of the application process, this data will be blocked for further use
   and deleted upon expiry of any storage obligations, unless you
   expressly consent to any other processing.
   [ ]

Data transfer

   If you have ordered goods which we will send to you by post, we will
   pass on the data required for the fulfilment of the contract in
   accordance with art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. b GDPR to the shipping
   company commissioned with the delivery if this is necessary for the
   delivery of ordered goods. Depending on which payment service provider
   you select in the order process, we pass on the payment data collected
   for the processing of payments to the credit institution commissioned
   with the payment and, if applicable, to payment service providers
   commissioned by us or to the selected payment service. In some cases,
   the selected payment service providers also collect this data
   themselves if you create an account there. In this case, you must log
   in to the payment service provider with your access data during the
   ordering process. The data protection declaration of the respective
   payment service provider applies in this respect.

   We use a payment service provider based in a country outside the
   European Union. The transmission of personal data to this company only
   takes place within the scope of the necessity to fulfil the contract.

   Credit check when registering for Trusted Shops membership for online
   merchants
   Only if you act in the exercise of your commercial or self-employed
   professional activity, we transmit your address data to credit agencies
   when concluding a membership contract for online merchants for the
   purpose of assessing the liability risk and for credit assessment if
   necessary. This serves to settle the contractual relationship pursuant
   to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. b GDPR.

   We transfer the personal data required for a credit assessment to the
   following company(s):

   Verband der Vereine Creditreform e.V.
   Hellersbergstr. 12
   D-41460 Neuss, Germany

   Appropriate measures to protect your rights, freedoms and legitimate
   interests will be taken into account. You have the opportunity to make
   your views known and to challenge the decision by contacting the
   contact person described below.
   [ ]

E-mail newsletter and postal advertising

   E-mail advertising with registration for the newsletter
   If you register for one of our newsletters or provide your data in
   order to download a document free of charge from our website or our
   Facebook or LinkedIn presence, we use the data required for this or
   separately provided by you in order to regularly send you our e-mail
   newsletter on the basis of your consent in accordance with art. 6 para.
   1 sentence 1 lit. a GDPR.

   The newsletter is sent on our behalf by service providers to whom we
   pass on your e-mail address for this purpose.

   If the newsletter is sent via a service provider based in the USA, it
   is certified under the EU-US Privacy Shield. As a result of this
   agreement between the US and the European Commission, the latter has
   established an adequate level of data protection for companies
   certified under the Privacy Shield.

   You can unsubscribe from the newsletter at any time and either by
   sending a message to the contact option described below or via a link
   provided for this purpose in the newsletter. After deregistration, we
   delete your e-mail address unless you have expressly consented to
   further use of your data or we reserve the right to use data beyond
   this, which is permitted by law and about which we inform you in this
   declaration.

   E-mail advertising without registration for the newsletter and your
   right of objection
   If we receive your e-mail address in connection with the sale of a
   product or service and you have not objected to this, we reserve the
   right to regularly send you offers for similar products, such as those
   already purchased, from our range by e-mail in accordance with Section
   7 (3) UWG. This serves to safeguard our legitimate interests in an
   advertising approach to our customers that are overriding in the
   process of balancing of interests in accordance with art. 6 para. 1
   sentence 1 lit. f GDPR.

   The newsletter is sent on our behalf by service providers to whom we
   pass on your e-mail address for this purpose.

   If the newsletter is sent via a service provider based in the USA, it
   is certified under the EU-US Privacy Shield. As a result of this
   agreement between the US and the European Commission, the latter has
   established an adequate level of data protection for companies
   certified under the Privacy Shield.

   You can object to this use of your e-mail address at any time by
   sending a message to the contact option described below or via a link
   provided for this purpose in the advertising e-mail.

   Postal advertising and your right of objection
   Furthermore, we reserve the right to use your first and last name as
   well as your postal address for our own advertising purposes, e.g. to
   send interesting offers and information about our products by post.
   This serves to safeguard our legitimate interests in an advertising
   approach to our customers that are overriding in the process of
   balancing of interests in accordance with art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1
   lit. f GDPR.

   The advertising mailings are processed on our behalf by a service
   provider to whom we pass on your data.

   You can object to the storage and use of your data for these purposes
   at any time by sending a message to the contact option described below.
   [ ]

Integration of the Trusted Shops Trustbadge

   To display our ratings collected, the Trusted Shops Trustbadge is
   integrated on some of our websites.

   Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. f GDPR, this serves to
   safeguard our legitimate interests in the optimal marketing of our
   offer that are overriding in the process of balancing of interests. The
   Trustbadge and the services advertised with it are an offer of Trusted
   Shops GmbH, Subbelrather Str. 15C, 50823 Cologne.

   When the Trustbadge is called, the web server automatically saves a
   so-called server log file, which contains e.g. your IP address, date
   and time of the call, transferred data volume and the requesting
   provider (access data) and documents the call. This access data is not
   evaluated and is automatically overwritten at the latest seven days
   after the end of your page visit.
   [ ]

Cookies

   To improve the user experience on our website and enable you to use its
   certain features in order to show suitable products or conduct market
   research, some pages of this website use the so-called cookies. This
   serves the protection of our legitimate interests in the optimised
   presentation of our offer according to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f
   GDPR that are overriding in the process of balancing of interests. A
   cookie is a small text file which is stored automatically on your end
   device. Some of the cookies we use are deleted after you close the
   browser session, i.e. when you close the browser (that’s the so-called
   session cookies). Other cookies are stored in your end-user device and
   enable us to recognise your browser when you visit us again (persistent
   cookies). To check the cookie storage period, you can use the Overview
   function in the cookie settings of your web browser. You can configure
   your browser for it to inform you whenever a page uses cookies and
   decide on a case-by-case basis whether to accept or reject the cookies
   on a given website or generally. Every browser has a different policy
   for managing the cookie settings. The browser’s policy is described in
   the Help menu of every browser and explains how you can change your
   cookie settings. To find out how to change the settings in your
   browser, see the links below:

   Internet Explorer™:
   https://support.microsoft.com/en-gb/help/17442/windows-internet-explore
   r-delete-manage-cookies
   Safari™:
   https://support.apple.com/kb/PH21411?locale=de_DE&viewlocale=en_US
   Chrome™: https://support.google.com/chrome/answer/95647?hl=en&hlrm=en
   Firefox™:
   https://support.mozilla.org/en-US/kb/enable-and-disable-cookies-website
   -preferences
   Opera™ : http://help.opera.com/Windows/10.20/en/cookies.html

   Please note that disabling cookies may limit your access to some
   features of our website.

a. Web analysis

   Use of Google (Universal) Analytics for web analysis
   For website analysis, this website uses Google (Universal) Analytics, a
   web analysis service of Google LLC (www.google.de). Pursuant to art. 6
   para. 1 sentence 1 lit f GDPR, this serves to safeguard our legitimate
   interests in an optimised presentation of our offer that are overriding
   in the process of balancing of interests. Google (Universal) Analytics
   uses methods that enable an analysis of your use of the website, such
   as cookies. The automatically collected information about your use of
   this website is usually transferred to a Google server in the USA and
   stored there. By activating IP anonymisation on this website, the IP
   address is shortened prior to transmission within the Member States of
   the European Union or in other states party to the Agreement on the
   European Economic Area. Only in exceptional cases will the full IP
   address be transmitted to a Google server in the USA and shortened
   there. The anonymous IP address transmitted by your browser within the
   framework of Google Analytics is not merged with other Google data.
   After the end of the use of Google Analytics by us the data collected
   in this context will be deleted.

   Google LLC is headquartered in the USA and is certified under the EU-US
   Privacy Shield. A current certificate can be viewed here. As a result
   of this agreement between the US and the European Commission, the
   latter has established an adequate level of data protection for
   companies certified under the Privacy Shield.

   You can prevent Google from collecting the data generated by the cookie
   and relating to your use of the website (including your IP address) and
   from processing this data by Google by downloading and installing the
   browser plug-in available under the following link:
   http://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout?hl=en. As an alternative to the
   browser plugin, you can click this link to prevent Google Analytics
   from collecting data on this website in the future. An opt-out cookie
   is stored on your mobile device. If you delete your cookies, you must
   click the link again.

   Use of Hubspot for web analysis
   For website analysis purposes, Hubspot, Inc. (www.hubspot.com)
   Automatically collects and stores data from which user profiles are
   created using pseudonyms. Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f
   GDPR, this serves to safeguard our legitimate interests in an optimised
   presentation of our offer that are overriding in the process of
   balancing of interests. Cookies may be used for this purpose. After the
   end of the use of Hubspot by us, the data collected in this context
   will be deleted.

   Hubspot, Inc. is headquartered in the USA and is certified under the
   EU-US Privacy Shield. A current certificate can be viewed here. As a
   result of this agreement between the US and the European Commission,
   the latter has established an adequate level of data protection for
   companies certified under the Privacy Shield.

   You can object to the collection and storage of data at any time with
   future effect by storing an opt-out cookie on your device or by
   suppressing the functionality of the tool with the help of an
   appropriate browser plugin, e.g. Ghostery.

   Use of Hotjar for web analysis
   For website analysis purposes, data is automatically collected and
   stored on this website using technologies of Hojar Limited
   (www.hotjar.com), from which user profiles are created using
   pseudonyms. Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f GDPR, this
   serves to safeguard our legitimate interests in an optimised
   presentation of our offer that are overriding in the process of
   balancing of interests. Cookies may be used for this purpose. The
   pseudonymised user profiles are not combined with personal data about
   the bearer of the pseudonym without express consent to be given
   separately. After the end of the use of Hotjar by us the data collected
   in this context will be deleted. You can object to the collection and
   storage of data at any time with future effect by clicking this link.

   After your objection, an opt-out cookie is stored on your mobile
   device. If you delete your cookies, you must click the link again.

   Use of Optimizely for web analysis and A/B tests
   For website analysis and A/B tests, data is automatically collected and
   stored on this website with technologies of Optimizely GmbH
   (www.optimizely.com), from which user profiles are created using
   pseudonyms. Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f GDPR, this
   serves to safeguard our legitimate interests in an optimised
   presentation of our offer that are overriding in the process of
   balancing of interests. Cookies may be used for this purpose. The
   pseudonymised user profiles are not combined with personal data about
   the bearer of the pseudonym without express consent to be given
   separately. After the end of our use of Optimizely the data collected
   in this context will be deleted. You can object to the collection and
   storage of data at any time with future effect by clicking this link.

   After your objection, an opt-out cookie is stored on your mobile
   device. If you delete your cookies, you must click the link again.

   Use of Tealium
   This website uses technologies from Tealium, Inc. (www.tealium.com)
   Automatically collected and stored data from which user profiles are
   created using pseudonyms. Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f
   GDPR, this serves to safeguard our legitimate interests in an optimised
   presentation of our offer that are overriding in the process of
   balancing of interests. Cookies may be used for this purpose. The data
   collected in this context will be deleted once we have ceased using
   Tealium for its intended purpose and at the end of its use.

   Tealium, Inc. is headquartered in the USA and is certified under the
   EU-US Privacy Shield. A current certificate can be viewed here. As a
   result of this agreement between the US and the European Commission,
   the latter has established an adequate level of data protection for
   companies certified under the Privacy Shield.

   You can object to the collection and storage of data at any time with
   future effect by storing an opt-out cookie on your device or by
   suppressing the functionality of the tool with the help of an
   appropriate browser plugin, e.g. Ghostery.

b. Advertising via marketing networks

   Google Tag Manager
   We use the Google Tag Manager to manage usage-based advertising
   services. The Tag Manager itself is a cookie-free domain and does not
   collect any personal data. Rather, the tool triggers other tags that
   may in turn collect data (see above). If you have disabled at the
   domain or cookie level, it will remain for all tracking tags
   implemented with Google Tag Manager.

   Google Double Click
   This website uses the so-called DoubleClick cookie as part of the
   Google Analytics application, which enables your browser to be
   recognised when you visit other websites. Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1
   sentence 1 lit f GDPR, this serves to safeguard our legitimate
   interests in an optimal marketing of our website that are overriding in
   the process of balancing of interests. The information automatically
   generated by the cookie about your visit to this website is transferred
   to a Google server in the USA and stored there. The IP address will be
   reduced by activating IP anonymisation on this website prior to
   transmission within the Member States of the European Union or in other
   states party to the Agreement on the European Economic Area. Only in
   exceptional cases will the full IP address be transmitted to a Google
   server in the USA and shortened there. The anonymous IP address
   transmitted by your browser as part of Google Analytics will not be
   merged with other Google data. After the end of the use of the Google
   services by us the data collected in this context will be deleted.

   Google Double Click is a service of Google LLC. (www.google.de). Google
   LLC is headquartered in the USA and is certified under the EU-US
   Privacy Shield. A current certificate can be viewed here. As a result
   of this agreement between the US and the European Commission, the
   latter has established an adequate level of data protection for
   companies certified under the Privacy Shield.

   You can disable the DoubleClick cookie using this link. You can also
   contact the Digital Advertising Alliance to find out how to set cookies
   and to make the relevant settings. Finally, you can set your browser so
   that you are informed about the setting of cookies and decide
   individually whether to accept them or to exclude the acceptance of
   cookies for certain cases or in general. If cookies are not accepted,
   the functionality of our website may be limited.

   Google AdSense
   Our site uses Google AdSense to market space for third-party ads and
   advertising networks. These ads are displayed in various places on this
   website. As part of the integration of Google AdSense, the so-called
   DoubleClick cookie is set by Google for all page visitors. This enables
   the display of interest-compatible advertising by automatically
   assigning a pseudonymous UserID, with the help of which the interests
   are determined on the basis of visits to this and other websites.
   Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f GDPR, this serves to
   safeguard our legitimate interests in an optimal marketing of our
   website that are overriding in the process of balancing of
   interests. After the end of the use of the Google services by us the
   data collected in this context will be deleted.

   Google AdSense is a service of Google LLC (www.google.de). Google LLC
   is headquartered in the USA and is certified under the EU-US Privacy
   Shield. A current certificate can be viewed here. As a result of this
   agreement between the US and the European Commission, the latter has
   established an adequate level of data protection for companies
   certified under the Privacy Shield.

   You can disable the cookie using this link. You can also contact the
   Digital Advertising Alliance to find out how to set cookies and to make
   the relevant settings.

   Google AdWords Remarketing and Google Analytics Audiences
   We use Google Adwords Remarketing and Google Analytics Audiences to
   advertise this website in Google search results and on third-party
   websites. When you visit our website, Google sets the so-called
   remarketing cookie or additionally uses the Google Analytics cookie. In
   this case, both cookies automatically enable interest-based advertising
   by means of a pseudonymous CookieID and on the basis of the pages you
   have visited. After our use of Google AdWords Remarketing and Google
   Analytics has ceased and has ended, the data collected in this context
   will be deleted. Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f GDPR, the
   use of these tools serves to safeguard our legitimate interests in an
   optimal marketing of our website that are overriding in the process of
   balancing of interests. After the end of the use of the Google services
   by us the data collected in this context will be deleted.

   Any additional processing will only take place if you have agreed with
   Google that your web and app browsing history will be linked to your
   Google Account and information from your Google Account will be used to
   personalise ads you see on the web. If you are logged in to Google
   while visiting our website, Google will use your data together with
   Google Analytics data to create and define target group lists for
   cross-device remarketing. To this end, Google temporarily links your
   personal data with Google Analytics data to form target groups.

   Google AdWords Remarketing and Google Analytics are services of Google
   LLC (www.google.com). Google LLC is headquartered in the USA and is
   certified under the EU-US Privacy Shield. A current certificate can be
   viewed here. As a result of this agreement between the US and the
   European Commission, the latter has established an adequate level of
   data protection for companies certified under the Privacy Shield.

   You can disable the remarketing cookie via this link. You can also
   click this link to prevent future collection by Google Analytics on
   this website. An opt-out cookie is stored on your mobile device. If you
   delete your cookies, you must click the link again.

   You can also contact the Digital Advertising Alliance to find out how
   to set cookies and to make the relevant settings.

   AdRoll Retargeting
   Through our advertising partner AdRoll Advertising Limited, Level 6, 1,
   Burlington Plaza, Burlington Road, Dublin 4, Ireland, we advertise this
   website in search results and on third-party websites. When you visit
   our website, a cookie from these providers or their partners is
   automatically set, which enables interest-based advertising by means of
   a pseudonymous cookie ID and on the basis of the pages you visit.
   Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f GDPR, this serves to
   safeguard our legitimate interests in an optimal marketing of our
   website that are overriding in the process of balancing of
   interests. After the end of our use of AdRoll Retargeting, the data
   collected in this context will be deleted.

   You can disable the retargeting cookie by clicking on one of the
   following links: https://app.adroll.com/optout/safari.

   Alternatively, you can disable the use of cookies by third parties by
   visiting the opt-out page of the Digital Advertising Alliance.

   LinkedIn Insight & Conversion Tag
   Through our advertising partner LinkedIn Corporation, we advertise this
   website on the LinkedIn platform (www.linkedin.com). When you visit our
   website, a cookie from this provider is automatically set, which
   enables interest-based advertising by means of a pseudonymous cookie ID
   and based on the pages you have visited. Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1
   sentence 1 lit f GDPR, this serves to safeguard our legitimate
   interests in an optimal marketing of our website that are overriding in
   the process of balancing of interests. After the end of our use of the
   LinkedIn Insight & Conversion Tag, the data collected in this context
   will be deleted.

   You can disable the remarketing cookie via this link. You can also
   contact the Digital Advertising Alliance to find out how to set cookies
   and to make the relevant settings.

   Twitter Ads & Conversion
   Through our advertising partner Twitter, Inc., we advertise this
   website on the Twitter platform (www.twitter.com). When you visit our
   website, a cookie from this provider is automatically set, which
   enables interest-based advertising by means of a pseudonymous cookie ID
   and based on the pages you have visited. Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1
   sentence 1 lit f GDPR, this serves to safeguard our legitimate
   interests in an optimal marketing of our website that are overriding in
   the process of balancing of interests. After the end of our use of
   Twitter the data collected in this context will be deleted.

   You can disable the remarketing cookie via this link. You can also
   contact the Digital Advertising Alliance to find out how to set cookies
   and to make the relevant settings.

   Advertising via the pixel of the social network Facebook
   On this website the Facebook pixel is integrated. We use the following
   functions of the Facebook Pixel for the specified purposes:
     * Facebook Connect, analysis of access data for the purposes of
       interest-based advertising on Facebook;
     * Facebook Custom Audience, analysis of access data for purposes of
       targeted advertising to third parties on Facebook;
     * Facebook Events, analysis of access data for the purpose of
       advertising upcoming events;
     * Facebook Pixel Remarketing, analysis of the access data of product
       pages for the purpose of displaying interest-based advertising on
       Facebook;
     * Facebook Pixel Tracking, analysis of access data for the purpose of
       interest-based advertising on Facebook;
     * Facebook Pixel Conversions, analysis of the conversion data at
       order completion (order value, currency, indication of whether
       existing or new customer) for purposes of interest-based
       advertising on Facebook and the billing of these.

   The Facebook pixel automatically sets a cookie when you visit our
   website, which automatically uses a pseudonymous cookie ID and the
   pages you visit to enable the above functions for the purposes
   explained. Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f GDPR, this
   serves to safeguard our legitimate interests in an optimal marketing of
   our website that are overriding in the process of balancing of
   interests. The data collected in this context will be deleted once the
   Facebook services have ceased to be used for their intended purpose and
   at the end of their use.

   The Facebook Pixel is a service of Facebook, Inc. (www.facebook.com).
   Facebook, Inc. is headquartered in the USA and is certified under the
   EU-US Privacy Shield. A current certificate can be viewed here. As a
   result of this agreement between the US and the European Commission,
   the latter has established an adequate level of data protection for
   companies certified under the Privacy Shield.

   You can object to the collection and storage of data at any time with
   future effect by storing an opt-out cookie on your device or by
   suppressing the functionality of the tool with the help of an
   appropriate browser plugin, e.g. Ghostery.

   You can also object to this processing of your data by contacting the
   Digital Advertising Alliance to find out about the setting of cookies
   and to make the relevant settings. After your objection, an opt-out
   cookie may be stored on your terminal. If you delete your cookies, you
   must click the links explained here again.
   [ ]

Social Media PlugIns

   Use of the social plugins from Facebook, Google, Twitter, Instagram,
   Pinterest using the Shariff solution
   On our website social buttons are used by social networks.

   In order to increase the protection of your data when you visit our
   website, these buttons are not fully integrated into the page as
   plug-ins, but only by using an HTML link. This integration ensures that
   no connection to the servers of the provider of the respective social
   network is established when a page of our website containing such
   buttons is called up.

   Click on one of the buttons, a new window of your browser opens and
   calls up the page of the respective service provider, on which you can
   (if necessary after entering your login data) e.g. press the Like or
   Share button. The purpose and scope of the data collection and the
   further processing and use of the data by the providers on their pages
   as well as the possibility of contact and your relevant rights and
   setting options for the protection of your privacy can be found in the
   data protection information of the providers.

   http://www.facebook.com/policy.php
   https://twitter.com/privacy
   http://www.google.com/intl/en/+/policy/+1button.html
   https://help.instagram.com/155833707900388
   https://policy.pinterest.com/en/privacy-policy

   Youtube Video Plugins
   This website integrates content via the video platform service
   Youtube. Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f GDPR, this serves
   to safeguard our legitimate interests in an optimal presentation of our
   offer that are overriding in the process of balancing of interests.

   Youtube is operated by Google LLC (www.google.com). Google LLC is
   headquartered in the USA and is certified under the EU-US Privacy
   Shield. A current certificate can be viewed here. As a result of this
   agreement between the US and the European Commission, the latter has
   established an adequate level of data protection for companies
   certified under the Privacy Shield.

   For videos from Youtube, which are integrated on our site, the extended
   data protection setting is activated. This means that no information
   from website visitors is collected and stored on YouTube unless they
   play the video. The purpose and scope of the data collection and the
   further processing and use of the data by the providers as well as your
   relevant rights and setting options for the protection of your privacy
   can be found in the data protection information of Google
   http://www.google.com/intl/en/+/policy/+1button.html.“.

   Vimeo Video Plugins
   This website integrates content via the video platform service Vimeo.

   Vimeo is operated by Vimeo LLC, 555 West 18th Street, New York 10011,
   USA („Vimeo“). Pursuant to art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit f GDPR, this
   serves to safeguard our legitimate interests in an optimal presentation
   of our offer that are overriding in the process of balancing of
   interests.

   The tracking tool Google Analytics is automatically integrated in
   videos from Vimeo that are integrated on our site. We have no influence
   on the settings of tracking and the analysis results collected in this
   way and cannot see them. In addition, web beacons are set for website
   visitors by embedding Vimeo videos.

   In order to prevent the use of Google Analytics tracking cookies, you
   may refuse the use of cookies by selecting the appropriate settings on
   your browser, however please note that if you do this you may not be
   able to use the full functionality of this website. You can also
   prevent Google from collecting the data generated by the cookie and
   relating to your use of the website (including your IP address) and
   from processing this data by Google by downloading and installing the
   browser plug-in available under the following link:
   http://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout?hl=en

   As an alternative to the browser plugin, you can click this link to
   prevent Google Analytics from collecting data on this website in the
   future. An opt-out cookie is stored on your mobile device. If you
   delete your cookies, you must click the link again. The purpose and
   scope of the data collection and the further processing and use of the
   data by the providers as well as your relevant rights and setting
   options for the protection of your privacy can be found in Vimeo’s data
   protection information at https://vimeo.com/privacy
   [ ]

Our online presence on social media platforms

   Our presences on social networks and platforms serve a better, active
   communication with our customers and interested parties. We inform
   there about our products and current special offers.
   When you visit our websites in social media, your data may be
   automatically collected and stored for market research and advertising
   purposes. So-called usage profiles are created from these data using
   pseudonyms. These can be used, for example, to place advertisements
   inside and outside the platforms that presumably correspond to your
   interests. For this purpose, cookies are usually used on your terminal.
   The visitor behaviour and the interests of the users are stored in
   these cookies.

   This serves in accordance with Art. 6 para. 1 lit. f. GDPR to protect
   our legitimate interests, which outweigh our interests, in an optimised
   presentation of our offer and effective communication with customers
   and interested parties. If you are asked by the respective Social-Media
   platform operators for a consent (agreement) into the data processing,
   e.g. with the help of a checkbox, is the legal basis of the data
   processing art. 6 exp. 1 lit. a GDPR.

   If the aforementioned social media platforms are headquartered in the
   USA, the following applies: The European Commission has adopted a
   decision on appropriateness for the USA. This goes back to the EU-US
   Privacy Shield. A current certificate for the respective company can be
   viewed at https://www.privacyshield.gov/list
   For detailed information on the processing and use of the data by the
   providers on their pages as well as a contact option and your rights
   and setting options for the protection of your privacy, in particular
   opt-out options, please refer to the providers’ data protection
   information linked below. If you still need help, you can contact us.

   Facebook: https://www.facebook.com/about/privacy/
   Google/ YouTube: https://policies.google.com/privacy
   Twitter: https://twitter.com/de/privacy
   Instagram: http://instagram.com/about/legal/privacy/
   Pinterest: https://about.pinterest.com/de/privacy-policy
   LinkedIn: https://www.linkedin.com/legal/privacy-policy
   Xing: https://privacy.xing.com/de/datenschutzerklaerung
   Widerspruchsmöglichkeiten (Opt-Out):
   Facebook: https://www.facebook.com/settings?tab=ads
   Google/ YouTube: https://adssettings.google.com/authenticated
   Twitter: https://twitter.com/personalization
   Instagram: http://instagram.com/about/legal/privacy/
   Pinterest: https://www.pinterest.de/?next=/settings/
   LinkedIn:
   https://www.linkedin.com/psettings/guest-controls/retargeting-opt-out
   Xing:
   https://privacy.xing.com/de/datenschutzerklaerung/welche-rechte-koennen
   -sie-geltend-machen/widerspruchsrecht
   [ ]

Pixel of the VG WORT

   On some of our websites the pixel of VG WORT is integrated, via which
   we record the page accesses in order to report them to the
   Verwertungsgesellschaft Wort (VG Wort). This serves the purpose of
   enabling our authors to participate in the distributions of VG WORT and
   is based on our legal obligation to ensure the legal remuneration for
   the use of copyrighted works pursuant to Section 53 UrhG in accordance
   with art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. c GDPR.
   [ ]

Sending rating reminders by e-mail

   If you have given us your express consent to this during or after your
   order in accordance with art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. a GDPR, we will
   use your e-mail address to send you an evaluation reminder by e-mail.

   The consent can be revoked at any time by sending a message to the
   contact option described below with effect for the future.

   In other cases, requests for evaluation are sent as consideration for
   free membership and thus as an integral part of the membership
   contract. In these cases, data processing is necessary for the
   fulfilment of the contract and is therefore based on Art. 6 para. 1
   sentence 1 lit. b GDPR.
   [ ]

Contact possibilities and your rights

   As a data subject, you have the following rights:

   in accordance with art. 15 GDPR, you have the right to request
   information about your personal data processed by us to the extent
   described therein;

   in accordance with art. 16 GDPR, you have the right to demand the
   immediate correction of incorrect or complete personal data stored by
   us;

   in accordance with art. 17 GDPR, the right to request the deletion of
   your personal data stored with us, unless further processing
     * to exercise freedom of expression and information;
     * for the fulfilment of a legal obligation;
     * for reasons of public interest; or
     * for asserting, exercising or defending legal claims

   is required;

   in accordance with art. 18 GDPR, the right to request the restriction
   of the processing of your personal data, insofar as
     * the correctness of the data is denied by you;
     * the processing is unlawful, but you refuse to delete it;
     * we no longer need the data, but you do need it to assert, exercise
       or defend legal claims, or
     * you have lodged an objection to the processing pursuant to art. 21
       GDPR;

   In accordance with art. 20 GDPR, you have the right to receive your
   personal data that you have provided to us in a structured, current and
   machine-readable format or to request its transfer to another person
   responsible;

   the right to complain to a supervisory authority pursuant to art. 77
   GDPR. You can also contact the supervisory authority at your usual
   place of residence or workplace or at our company headquarters.

   If you have any questions regarding the collection, processing or use
   of your personal data, information, correction, restriction of the
   processing or deletion of data or revocation of any consent given or
   objection to a specific use of data, please contact our company data
   protection officer.

   Data Protection Officer
   Subbelrather Str. 15c
   50823 Cologne
   privacy@trustedshops.com
   [ ]

Right of objection

   Insofar as we process personal data as described above in order to
   protect our legitimate interests that are overriding in the process of
   balancing of interests, you can object to this processing with effect
   for the future. If the data is processed for direct marketing purposes,
   you can exercise this right at any time as described above. If the
   processing takes place for other purposes, you are only entitled to a
   right of objection if there are reasons arising from your particular
   situation.

   After exercising your right of objection, we will not process your
   personal data further for these purposes, unless we can prove
   compelling reasons worthy of protection for the processing, which
   outweigh your interests, rights and freedoms, or if the processing
   serves to assert, exercise or defend legal claims.

   This does not apply if the processing is for direct marketing purposes.
   Then we will not process your personal data for this purpose.

   For online shoppers
     * Trustmark
     * Buyer protection
     * Customer reviews
     * FAQ
     * Trustmark fraud
     * Contact

   Corporate
     * About us
     * Jobs
     * Press
     * Imprint & data privacy

   For retailers
     * Products & Pricing
     * Success stories
     * Support

   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-TPWN9Q
   #alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate

     * Shops
     * Trustmark
     * Buyer protection
     * Customer reviews
     * Contact us
     * For retailers

     * Shopper-Login
     * For retailers

Shop
Around
Europe.

SHOP ONLINE WITH TRUSTED SHOPS.

     * Authentic customer reviews
     * Europe’s leading trustmark
     * Real money-back guarantee

Trusted Shops
The European trust brand in e-commerce

For online shoppers

   Online shopping has never been so easy and safe! With Trusted Shops and
   its widely-recognised trustmark, its money-back guarantee of up to
   2.500€ per purchase, and authentic customer reviews.

   Information for online shoppers

For online retailers

   Learn more about the Trusted Shops trust tools for online shops and see
   how the trustmark, customer reviews, and the money-back guarantee can
   help you boost your conversion rate and your sales.

   Information for online retailers

Some of our
20,000+ partner shops

   creativ-point.eu
   Home & Living creativ-point.eu
   [trusted-logo-mini.png]
   4.92 / 5.00
   DELIFE GmbH
   Home & Living DELIFE GmbH
   [trusted-logo-mini.png]
   4.62 / 5.00
   gilardy-shop.eu
   Clothing gilardy-shop.eu
   [trusted-logo-mini.png]
   4.92 / 5.00
   Mattenwerk
   Home & Living Mattenwerk
   [trusted-logo-mini.png]
   4.98 / 5.00
   mySpirits.eu
   Food mySpirits.eu
   [trusted-logo-mini.png]
   4.96 / 5.00

   [Any category__________________] ____________________ (BUTTON)

The sign of trust for
certified shops

   Online shops are checked for compliance with the Trusted Shops quality
   criteria before they are awarded the trustmark that they can then
   display on their website. Our quality criteria involve strict
   requirements as to the service quality as well as legal requirements.

   The security resulting from the trustmark, authentic customer reviews,
   and the money-back guarantee offered by the European leading trust
   brand is indeed very much appreciated by customers across the globe.


   Visit our FAQs
   [certificate-elementscertificate-shopwebsite.png]
   [certificate-elementscertificate-check-trustbadge.png]
   [certificate-elementscertificate-valid.png]
   [certificate-elementscertificate-mobile-collection.png]

Buyer protection for
carefree shopping

   Online shopping is fast, convenient, and anonymous. This anonymity also
   entails a lack of security: who am I actually buying from? What do I
   get in exchange for my money?

   That’s where we come into play: to make trust and security tangible for
   online shoppers like you. We offer the money-back guarantee covering
   orders of up to 2,500 EUR from all online shops bearing our trustmark.
   Visit our FAQs

Authentic reviews by
real customers

   Have the indicated delivery times been fulfilled? How does the customer
   service deal with problems? Does the product correspond to the
   description?

   You can find reliable answers to all these questions in the reviews
   posted by other customers like you. But shop and product reviews are
   only helpful if they are really authentic. That’s what the Trusted
   Shops review system is there for: for you to be able to rely on
   authentic reviews by real customers.
   Visit our FAQs
   diamondtreats.co.uk
   5.00 / 5.00

   Easy to order and a good delivery response Thank you for a top notch
   service.
   [bewertungen-anonym-avatar.png] Anonym
   diamondtreats.co.uk
   5.00 / 5.00

   Perfect
   [bewertungen-anonym-avatar.png] Anonym
   diamondtreats.co.uk
   5.00 / 5.00

   I have bought from Diamond Treats several times now. Studs for my
   daughter, hoops for my granddaughter. Good quality diamonds. G to H,
   S1…
   [bewertungen-anonym-avatar.png] Elaine G.
   diamondtreats.co.uk
   5.00 / 5.00

   Beautiful bracelet just as described, arrived on time and cannot fault
   the service.
   [bewertungen-anonym-avatar.png] Anonym
   diamondtreats.co.uk
   5.00 / 5.00

   Bought baguette hoop earrings for myself & my mum they are beautiful &
   amazing value. Plus a bracelet which is also beautiful. Very fast del…
   [bewertungen-anonym-avatar.png] Angela J.
   diamondtreats.co.uk
   4.67 / 5.00

   Very good range and good discretions. Choice arrived the next day and
   was exactly as seen online. Would definitely recommend to anyone .
   [bewertungen-anonym-avatar.png] Anonym
   diamondtreats.co.uk
   5.00 / 5.00

   Price, product and delivery was amazing
   [bewertungen-anonym-avatar.png] Anonym
   diamondtreats.co.uk
   5.00 / 5.00

   Fast delivery and excellent customer service when I had a question
   about returning items product is just as it shows you
   [bewertungen-anonym-avatar.png] Anonym
   diamondtreats.co.uk
   5.00 / 5.00

   Great service, speedy delivery and great quality goods
   [bewertungen-anonym-avatar.png] Anonym
   diamondtreats.co.uk
   5.00 / 5.00

   Very satisfied
   [bewertungen-anonym-avatar.png] Anonym

We are here for you –
contact us!

   Defective deliveries or unreceived, returned goods: when shopping
   online, it might happen that something goes wrong.

   But you don’t need to worry:
   the Trusted Shops service deals with it for you.
   Contact us

   For online shoppers
     * Trustmark
     * Buyer protection
     * Customer reviews
     * FAQ
     * Trustmark fraud
     * Contact

   Corporate
     * About us
     * Jobs
     * Press
     * Imprint & data privacy

   For retailers
     * Products & Pricing
     * Success stories
     * Support

   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-TPWN9Q
